CIK: 1162461
Company Name: CUTERA INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2017-03-15
Accession Number: 0001437749-17-004609


ITEM 1 BUSINESS We are a global medical device company founded as a Delaware corporation in 1998 and have our headquarters in Brisbane, California. We specialize in the design, development, manufacture, marketing and servicing of laser and other energy based aesthetics systems for practiti1rs worldwide. We offer easy to use products based on the following key product platforms en lighten TM , excel HR TM , truSculpt TM , excel V TM , and xeo each of which enables physicians and other qualified practiti1rs to perform safe and effective aesthetic procedures for their customers. Each of our laser and other energy based platforms consists of 1 or more hand pieces and a console that incorporates an intuitive user interface, a laser or other energy based module, control system software and high voltage electronics. However, depending on the application, the laser or other energy based module is sometimes contained in the hand piece itself. Our trademarks include "Cutera," Acutip , CoolGlide, enlighten, excel HR, excel V, GenesisPlus, , PicoGenesis, solera, titan, truSculpt, and xeo. Our logo and our other trade names, trademarks and service marks appearing in this document are our property. Other trade names, trademarks and service marks appearing in this annual report on Form 10 K are the property of their respective owners. Solely for convenience, our trademarks and trade names referred to in this annual report on Form 10 K appear without the or symbols, but those references are not intended to indicate, in any way, that we will not assert, to the fullest extent under applicable law, our rights, or the right of the applicable licensor to these trademarks and trade names. A description of each of our hand pieces, and the aesthetic conditions they are designed to treat, is contained in the section below entitled Products and a summary of the features of our primary products is as follows enlighten In December 2014, we introduced our enlighten laser platform with a dual wavelength (1064 nanometer, or nm + 532 nm) and in December 2016 we introduced a 3 wavelength (1064 nm + 532 nm+ 670 nm) model called enlighten III . The enlighten system is a dual pulse duration (750 picosecond, or ps, and 2 nanosecond, or ns ) laser system and is cleared for multi colored tattoo removal and for the treatment of benign pigmented lesions. excel HR In June 2014, we introduced our excel HR platform, a premium hair removal solution for all skin types, combining Cutera proven long pulse 1064 nm NdYAG laser and a high power 755 nm Alexandrite laser with sapphire contact cooling. truSculpt In August 2012, we commenced shipments of our truSculpt platform with a 25cm 2 hand piece. truSculpt is a high powered radio frequency ( RF ) platform designed for deep tissue heating. This system is designed to treat all body areas and with its unique electrode design is able to achieve comfortable, uniform heating of subcutaneous tissue. In the fourth quarter of 2012, we commenced shipping a larger 40cm 2 hand piece that enables faster treatments of larger areas. In the third quarter of 2013, we commenced shipping a smaller 16 cm 2 hand piece. In December 2016, we received a 510(k) clearance from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration ( FDA ) to market truSculpt for the temporary reduction in circumference of the abdomen. excel V In February 2011, we introduced our excel V platform, a high performance, vascular and benign pigmented lesion treatment platform designed specifically for the core market of dermatologists and plastic surgeons. This platform provides a combination of the 532 nm green laser with Cutera s award winning 1064 nm NdYAG technology, to provide a single, compact and efficient system that treats the entire range of cosmetic vascular and benign pigmented lesion conditions, without the need for costly consumables. xeo In 2003, we introduced the xeo platform, which can combine pulsed light and laser applications in a single system. The xeo is a multi application platform on which a customer can purchase hand piece applications for the removal of unwanted hair, treatment of vascular lesions, and skin revitalization by treating discoloration, fine lines and laxity. Other than the above menti1d five primary systems, we continue to generate revenue from our legacy products such as GenesisPlus TM , CoolGlide , solera , and a third party sourced system called myQ TM for the Japanese market. We offer our customers the ability to select the systems and applications that best fit their practice and to subsequently upgrade their systems to add new applications. This upgrade path allows our customers to cost effectively build their aesthetic practices and provides us with a source of incremental revenue. In addition to systems and upgrades, we generate revenue from the sale of post warranty services, Titan hand piece refills, and skincare products (Japanese market only). The Structure of Skin and Conditions that Affect Appearance The skin is the body largest organ and is comprised of 2 layers called the epidermis and dermis. The epidermis is the outer layer, and serves as a protective barrier for the body. It contains cells that determine pigmentation, or skin color. The underlying layer of skin, the dermis, contains hair follicles and large and small blood vessels that are found at various depths below the epidermis. Collagen, also found within the dermis, provides strength and flexibility to the skin. 3 Table of Contents Many factors, including advancing age, smoking, and sun damage, can result in aesthetically unpleasant changes in the appearance of the skin. These changes can include Undesirable hair growth; Enlargement or swelling of blood vessels due to circulatory changes that become visible at the skin surface in the form of unsightly veins; Deterioration of collagen, leading to uneven texture, wrinkles and skin laxity; and Uneven pigmentation or sun spots due to long term sun exposure. In addition to these skin conditions, people seek removal of unwanted tattoos as well as removal of fat in certain body areas in order to improve their appearance and confidence. The Market for Non Surgical Aesthetic Procedures The market for non surgical aesthetic procedures has grown significantly over the past several years. Medical Insight, an independent industry research and analysis firm, estimated that in 2015 total sales of products in the global aesthetic market exceeded $7 billion and indicated that total sales should increase 118% annually through 2019. For North America, the American Society of Plastic Surgeons estimates that in 2015 there were over 14.2 million minimally invasive aesthetic procedures performed, a 2% increase over 2014 and a 158% increase over 2000. We believe there are several factors contributing to the global growth of aesthetic treatment procedures and aesthetic laser equipment sales, including Improved Economic Environment and Expanded Physician Base The improvements in overall global economic conditions since the last recession have created increased demand for aesthetic procedures, which in turn has resulted in an expanding practiti1r base to satisfy the demand. Aging Demographics of Industrialized Countries The aging population of industrialized countries, the amount of discretionary income available to the baby boomer demographic segment ages 52 to 70 in 2016 and their desire to retain a youthful appearance, have increased the demand for aesthetic procedures. In 2016, there were approximately 75 million people in the baby boomer category, which is nearly 25%, of the U.S. population. Broader Range of Safe and Effective Treatments Technical developments, as well as an increase in treatable conditions due to new product introductions, have led to safe, effective, easy to use and low cost treatments with fewer side effects, resulting in broader adoption of aesthetic procedures by practiti1rs. In addition, technical developments have enabled practiti1rs to offer a broader range of treatments. These technical developments have reduced treatment and recovery times, which in turn have led to greater patient demand. Broader Base of Customers Managed care and government payer reimbursement restrictions on physicians, has motivated them to establish or seek to expand their elective aesthetic practices with procedures that are paid for directly by patients. As a result, in addition to the core users such as dermatologists and plastic surgeons, many other practiti1rs, such as gynecologists, family practiti1rs, primary care physicians, physicians performing aesthetic treatments in non medical offices, and other qualified practiti1rs ( non core practiti1rs ) have expanded their practices and are offering aesthetic procedures. Reductions in Cost per Procedure Due in part to increased competition in the aesthetic market, the cost per procedure has been reduced in the past few years. This has attracted a broader base of customers and patients for aesthetic procedures. Wide Acceptance of Aesthetic Procedures and Increased Focus on Body Image and Appearance According to an American Society for Aesthetic Plastic Surgery survey in 2010, 51% of Americans (including 53% of women and 49% of men) approved of cosmetic surgery, and 67% of Americans responded that they would not be embarrassed if their friends or family knew they had underg1 a cosmetic procedure. Broader social acceptance of aesthetic treatments, has also driven the growth in aesthetic procedures. Non Surgical Aesthetic Procedures for Improving the Body and or Skin Appearance and Their Limitations Many alternative therapies are available for improving a person appearance by treating specific structures within the skin. These procedures utilize injections or abrasive agents to reach different depths of the dermis and the epidermis. In addition, non invasive and minimally invasive treatments have been developed that employ laser and other energy based technologies to achieve similar therapeutic results. Some of these common therapies and their limitations are described below. 4 Table of Contents Tattoo removal The only effective way to remove tattoos on the body is to utilize laser systems that deliver very short pulse durations with high peak power intensity in order to break up the ink particles that comprise tattoos. According to a Tattoo Incidence Study published in ORC International in June 2015, up to 27% of Americans have 1 or more tattoos, and that 1 in 4 tattoo bearing American adults have tattoo regret . Despite the effectiveness of lasers for tattoo removal, common complaints concerning laser tattoo removal include a low rate of complete clearance (sometimes no better than 50% after several treatments) as well as the high number of treatments for satisfactory clearance (often 10 or more treatments spaced four to eight weeks apart). The latest generation of picosecond pulse duration lasers, pulses in the trillionths of a second, meaningfully improve clearance as well as a reduction in total number of treatments. Hair Removal Techniques for hair removal include waxing, depilatories, tweezing, shaving, electrolysis and laser and other energy based hair removal. The only techniques that provide a long lasting solution are electrolysis and other energy based hair removal. Electrolysis is usually painful, time consuming and expensive for large areas, but is the most common method for removing light colored hair. During electrolysis, an electrologist inserts a needle directly into a hair follicle and activates an electric current in the needle. Since electrolysis only treats 1 hair follicle at a time, the treatment of an area as small as an upper lip may require numerous visits and many hours of treatment. In addition, electrolysis can cause blemishes and infection related to needle use. Non Invasive Body Contouring. Our radio frequency ( RF ) technology based truSculpt system is designed for the non invasive body contouring market. In performing the procedure, energy is applied to heat the dermis of the skin with the goal of shrinking and tightening collagen fibers. In addition, the RF energy procedure can be used for treating fat, due to its selectivity for heating subcutaneous adipose tissue while modestly heating the overlying skin. In December 2016 we received 510(k) clearance from the FDA to market truSculpt for the temporary reduction in circumference of the abdomen. Non invasive procedures result in a more subtle and incremental change to the skin, than for example a surgical facelift or a lipolysis procedure. Drawbacks to this approach may include surface irregularities that may resolve over time, and the risk of burning the treatment area. Skin Rejuvenation Skin rejuvenation treatments include a broad range of popular alternatives, including Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, microdermabrasions, radio frequency treatments and lasers and other energy based treatments. With these treatments, patients hope to improve overall skin t1 and texture, reduce pore size, tighten skin and remove other signs of aging, including mottled pigmentation, diffuse redness and wrinkles. All of these procedures are temporary solutions and must be repeated within several weeks or months to sustain their effect, thereby increasing the cost and inconvenience to patients. For example, the body absorbs Botox and collagen, and patients require supplemental injections every 3 to six months to maintain the benefits of these treatments. Some skin rejuvenation treatments, such as chemical peels and microdermabrasion, can have undesirable side effects. Chemical peels use acidic or caustic solutions to peel away the epidermis, and microdermabrasion generally utilizes sand crystals to resurface the skin. These techniques can lead to stinging, redness, irritation and scabbing. In addition, more serious complications, such as changes in skin color, can result from deeper chemical peels. Patients who undergo these deep chemical peels are also advised to avoid exposure to the sun for several months following the procedure. The American Society of Plastic Surgeons estimates that in 2015, approximately 6.8 million injections of Botox and 24 million injections of collagen and other soft tissue fillers were administered; and 13 million chemical peels and 800,000 microdermabrasion procedures were performed. Leg and Facial Veins Current aesthetic treatment methods for leg and facial veins include sclerotherapy and laser and other energy based treatments. With these treatments, patients seek to eliminate visible veins and improve overall skin appearance. Sclerotherapy requires a skilled practiti1r to inject a saline or detergent based solution into the target vein, which breaks down the vessel causing it to collapse and be absorbed into the body. The need to correctly position the needle on the inside of the vein makes it difficult to treat smaller veins, which limits the treatment of facial vessels and small leg veins. The American Society of Plastic Surgeons estimates that approximately 322,000 sclerotherapy procedures were performed in 2015. Laser and other energy based non surgical treatments for hair removal, veins, skin rejuvenation and body contouring are discussed in the following section and in the section entitled Our Applications and Procedures below. Laser and Other Energy Based Aesthetic Treatments Laser and other energy based aesthetic treatments can achieve therapeutic results by affecting structures within the skin. The development of safe and effective aesthetic treatments has created a well established market for these procedures. Ablative skin resurfacing is a method of improving the appearance of the skin by removing the outer layers of the skin. Ablative skin resurfacing procedures are considered invasive or minimally invasive, depending on how much of the epidermis is removed during a treatment. Non ablative skin resurfacing is a method of improving the appearance of the skin by treating the underlying structure of the skin without damaging the outer layers of the skin. Practiti1rs can use laser and other energy based technologies to selectively target hair follicles, veins or collagen in the dermis, as well as cells responsible for pigmentation in the epidermis, without damaging surrounding tissue. Practiti1rs can also use these technologies to safely remove portions of the epidermis and deliver heat to the dermis as a means of generating new collagen growth. Safe and effective laser and energy based treatments require an appropriate combination of the following four parameters 5 Table of Contents Energy Level the amount of light or radio frequency emitted to heat a target; Pulse Duration the time interval over which the energy is delivered; Spot Size or Electrode Size the diameter of the energy beam, which affects treatment depth and area; and Wavelength or Frequency the position in the electromagnetic spectrum which impacts the absorption and the effective depth of the energy delivered. For example, in the case of hair removal, by utilizing the correct combination of these parameters, a practiti1r can use a laser or other light source to selectively target melanin within the hair follicle to absorb the laser energy and destroy the follicle, without damaging other delicate structures in the surrounding tissue. Wavelength and spot size permit the practiti1r to target melanin in the base of the hair follicle, which is found in the dermis. The combination of pulse duration and energy level may vary, depending upon the thickness of the targeted hair follicle. A shorter pulse length with a high energy level is optimal to destroy fine hair, whereas coarse hair is best treated with a longer pulse length with lower energy levels. If treatment parameters are improperly set, non targeted structures within the skin may absorb the energy, thereby eliminating or reducing the therapeutic effect. In addition, improper setting of the treatment parameters or failure to protect the surface of the skin may cause burns, which can result in blistering, scabbing and skin discoloration. Technology and Design of Our Systems Our unique enlighten, truSculpt , excel HR, excel V , xeo , and GenesisPlus platforms provide the long lasting benefits of laser and other energy based aesthetic treatments. Our technology allows for a combination of a wide variety of applications available in a single system. Key features of our solutions include Multiple Applications Available in a Single System Our platforms feature multiple applications that enable practiti1rs to perform a variety of aesthetic procedures using a single device. These procedures include hair removal, vascular treatments and skin rejuvenation including the treatment of discoloration, fine lines, and uneven texture. Because practiti1rs can use our systems for multiple indications, the cost of a unit may be spread across a potentially greater number of patients and procedures and therefore may be more rapidly recovered. Technology and Design Leadership Our innovative laser technology combines long wavelength, adjustable energy levels, variable spot sizes and a wide range of pulse durations, allowing practiti1rs to customize treatments for each patient and condition. Our proprietary pulsed light hand pieces for the treatment of discoloration, hair removal and vascular treatments optimize the wavelength used for treatments and incorporate a monitoring system to increase safety. Our Titan hand pieces utilize a novel light source that had not been previously used for aesthetic treatments. Our Pearl and Pearl Fractional hand pieces, with proprietary YSGG technology, represent the first application of the 2790 nm wavelength for minimally invasive cosmetic dermatology. excel V is a stand al1 laser device that combines a new high power green laser with Cutera's award winning NdYAG technology, to provide a system that treats the entire range of cosmetic vascular conditions, without the need for costly consumables. truSculpt is a mono polar radio frequency platform with a unique electrode design that delivers high powered energy at 1 MHz for the deep and uniform heating of the subcutaneous tissues at sustained therapeutic temperatures. This system includes real time skin temperature sensing and a large 40cm 2 surface area for faster treatments over large areas of the body. Upgradeable Platform We have designed some of our products to allow our customers to cost effectively upgrade to our multi application systems ( solera and xeo ), which provides our customers with the option to add additional applications to their existing systems and provides us with a source of incremental revenue. We believe that product upgradeability allows our customers to take advantage of our latest product offerings and provide additional treatment options to their patients, thereby expanding the opportunities for their aesthetic practices. Treatments for Broad Range of Skin Types and Conditions Our products remove hair safely and effectively on patients of all skin types, including harder to treat patients with dark or tanned skin. In addition, the wide parameter range of our systems allows practiti1rs to effectively treat patients with both fine and coarse hair. Practiti1rs may use our products to treat spider and reticular veins (unsightly small veins in the leg); facial veins; and perform skin rejuvenation procedures for discoloration, texture, fine lines, and wrinkles on any type of skin. The ability to customize treatment parameters enables practiti1rs to offer safe and effective therapies to a broad base of their patients. Ease of Use We design our products to be easy to use. Our proprietary hand pieces are lightweight and ergonomic, minimizing user fatigue, and allow for clear views of the treatment area, reducing the possibility of unintended damage and increasing the speed of application. Our control console contains an intuitive user interface with 3 simple, independently adjustable controls from which to select a wide range of treatment parameters to suit each patient profile. The clinical navigation user interface on the xeo platform provides recommended clinical treatment parameter ranges based on patient criteria entered. Our Pearl and Pearl Fractional hand pieces include a scanner with multiple scan patterns to allow simple and fast treatments of the face. Risks involved in the use of our products include risks common to other laser and other energy based aesthetic procedures, including the risk of burns, blistering and skin discoloration. 6 Table of Contents Strategy Our goal is to maintain and expand our position as a leading worldwide provider of energy based aesthetic devices and complementary aesthetic products by executing the following strategies Continue to Expand our Product Offering Though we believe that our current portfolio of products is comprehensive, our research and development group has a pipeline of potential products under development that we expect to commercialize in the future. We launched GenesisPlus in 2010, excel V in 2011, truSculpt in 2012, the ProWave LX and truSculpt 16 cm 2 hand pieces in 2013 and excel HR and enlighten in 2014. Such products will allow us to leverage our existing customer call points and provide us with new customer call points, which will enhance the productivity of our distribution channels. Increasing Revenue and Improving Productivity We believe that the market for aesthetic systems will continue to offer growth opportunities. We continue to build brand recognition, add additional products to our international distribution channel, and focus on enhancing our global distribution ne2rk, all of which we expect will increase our revenue. Increasing Focus on Practiti1rs with Established Medical Offices We believe there is growth opportunity in targeting our products to a broad customer base. We believe that our customers success is largely dependent upon having an existing medical practice, in which our systems provide incremental revenue sources to augment their existing practice revenue. The success of our excel V platform has resulted from strong adoption by core customers in dermatology and plastic and reconstructive surgery. Leveraging our Installed Base With the introduction of excel V , truSculpt, excel HR and enlighten, we are able to effectively offer additional platforms into our existing installed base. In addition, each of these platforms allows for potential future upgrades to offer additional indications or capabilities. We believe this program aligns our interest in generating revenue with our customers interest in improving the return on their investment by expanding the range of treatments that can be performed in their practice. Generating Revenue from Services and Refillable Hand Pieces Our Titan and pulsed light hand pieces are refillable products, which provide us with a source of recurring revenue from our existing customers. We offer post warranty services to our customers either through extended service contracts to cover preventive maintenance or through direct billing for parts and labor. These post warranty services serve as additional sources of recurring revenue. Products Our CoolGlide , xeo , solera , GenesisPlus , excel V , truSculpt , myQ , excel HR and enlighten platforms allow for the delivery of multiple laser and energy based aesthetic applications from a single system. With our xeo and solera platforms, practiti1rs can purchase customized systems with a variety of our multi technology applications. The following table lists our currently offered products and each checked box represents the applications that were included in the product in the years noted. Hair Removal Vascular Lesions Skin Rejuvenation Non Invasive Body Contouring Applications System Platforms Products Year Energy Source Dyschromia Texture, Lines and Wrinkles Skin Laxity Melasma &Tattoo Removal CoolGlide CV 2000 (a) x Excel 2001 (a) x x Vantage 2002 (a) x x x xeo NdYAG 2003 (a) x x x OPS600 2003 (b) x LP560 2004 (b) x Titan S 2004 (c) x ProWave 770 2005 (b) x AcuTip 500 2005 (b) x Titan V XL 2006 (c) x LimeLight 2006 (b) x Pearl 2007 (d) x x Pearl Fractional 2008 (d) x ProWave LX 2013 (b) x solera Titan S 2004 (c) x ProWave 770 2005 (b) x OPS 600 2005 (b) x LP560 2005 (b) x AcuTip 500 2005 (b) x Titan V XL 2006 (c) x LimeLight 2006 (b) x GenesisPlus 2010 (a) x excel V 2011 (e) x x x myQ 2011 (e) X truSculpt 2012 (f) x excel HR 2014 (g) x e nlighten (dual wavelength) 2014 (h) x e nlighten III 2016 (i) x 7 Table of Contents Energy Sources (a). 1064nm NdYAG laser; (b). Flashlamp; (c). Infrared laser; (d). 2790 nm YSGG laser; (e). Combined frequency doubled 532 nm and 1064 nm NdYAG laser; (f). Radio frequency at 1 MHz (g) Combined frequency 755 nm Alexandrite laser and 1064 nm NdYAG laser; (h) Dual wavelength 532 nm and 1064 ND Yag laser; ( i ) 3 wavelength 532 nm, 670 nm, and 1064 ND Yag laser Our CE Mark allows us to market truSculpt in the European Union, Australia and certain other countries outside the U.S. for fat reduction, body shaping and body contouring. In the U.S. we have 510(k) clearance for the temporary reduction in circumference of the abdomen and elevating tissue temperature for the treatment of selected medical conditions such as relief of pain, muscle spasms, increase in local circulation, and the temporary improvement in the appearance of cellulite. Each of our products consists of a control console and 1 or more hand pieces, depending on the model. Control Console Our control console includes an intuitive user interface, control system software and high voltage electronics. All CoolGlide systems, GenesisPlus , excel V and some models of the xeo platform include our laser module which consists of electronics, a visible aiming beam, a focusing lens, and an NdYAG and or flashlamp laser that functions at wavelengths that permit penetration over a wide range of depths and is effective across all skin types. The interface allows the practiti1r to set the appropriate laser or flashlamp parameters for each procedure through a user friendly format. The control system software ensures that the operator instructions are properly communicated from the graphic user interface to the other comp1nts within the system. Our high voltage electronics produce over 10,000 watts of peak laser energy, which permits therapeutic effects at short pulse durations. Our solera console platform comes in 2 configurations Opus and Titan both of which include an intuitive user interface, control system software and high voltage electronics. The solera Opus console is designed specifically to drive our flashlamp hand pieces while the solera Titan console is designed specifically to drive the Titan hand pieces. The control system software is designed to ensure that the operator instructions are properly communicated from the graphical user interface to the other comp1nts within the system and includes real time calibration to control the output energy as the pulse is delivered during the treatment. Our truSculpt control console includes a high powered, mono polar RF generator at 1MHz capable of delivering up to 300 watts of energy. The truSculpt system dynamically adjusts current, voltage and power during treatment as needed to reach and maintain the appropriate treatment levels. Hand Pieces enlighten Hand Piece The enlighten hand piece delivers 532 nm, 670 nm (in enlighten III only), and 1064 nm laser energy to treat benign pigmented lesions and the removal of multi color tattoos. enlighten s single hand piece consists of an energy delivery comp1nt housing a motorized focus lens assembly connected to an articulated arm. The hand piece features spot size adjustability from 2 to 8mm, adjustable in 1 mm increments. As with all Cutera laser and light based systems, the hand piece does not require manual power calibration through a separate calibration port. The power calibration is automatic and built into the laser system. excel HR Hand Piece The dual wavelength excel HR system introduced in June 2014 delivers 1064 nm and 755 nm laser energy to the treatment area for hair removal. ex cel HR s single hand piece consists of an energy delivery comp1nt housing an optical fiber and lens. The hand piece features a sapphire window and peripheral cooling plate with temperature monitoring. The sapphire window allows for 30 watts of temperature regulation with user selectable settings ranging from 4 to 20 degrees centigrade and provides cooling of the skin before, during, and immediately after each laser pulse. This pre, parallel, and post cooling provides an anesthetic benefit that makes treatments more comfortable than systems without contact cooling, and also increases the safety profile of treatments by reducing the chances of burning skin. The hand piece has a wide spot size range between 3 to 18 mm (5 to 18 mm, alexandrite mode). truSculpt Hand Pieces The truSculpt product introduced in August 2012 is used for the non invasive heating of subcutaneous tissue. We sell 2 different truSculpt hand pieces 40 cm 2 for larger body parts and the 16cm 2 for smaller parts of the body. Each of the truSculpt hand pieces is light weight and ergonomically designed for operator comfort, which allows for the uniform heat distribution delivered by the hand pieces. In addition, the hand pieces have a built in, real time, temperature sensing system to monitor the temperature during the treatment. 8 Table of Contents excel V Hand Piece The excel V system introduced in February 2011 delivers 1064 nm and 532 nm laser energy to the skin for the treatment of vascular and benign pigmented lesion. The excel V system supports 2 hand pieces, both consisting of an energy delivery comp1nt housing an optical fiber and lens. 1 hand piece includes a sapphire window cooling plate with temperature monitoring. This hand piece offer a spot size range from 15 to 12 mm in 0.1 mm increments, and is capable of delivering either the 1064 nm or 532 nm laser energy. The second hand piece does not have a cooling plate and includes a non contact temperature sensor to monitor the treatment area temperature. In addition, this second hand piece includes dual aiming beams that facilitate consistent treatments by maintaining the correct distance of the hand piece to the skin to ensure that the fixed 8 mm spot size is maintained. 1064 nm NdYAG Hand Piece Our 1064nm NdYAG hand piece delivers laser energy to the treatment area for hair removal, leg and facial vein treatment, and skin rejuvenation procedures to treat skin texture and fine lines. The 1064nm NdYAG hand piece consists of an energy delivery comp1nt, consisting of an optical fiber and lens, and a copper cooling plate with embedded temperature monitoring. The hand piece weighs approximately 14 ounces, which is light enough to be held with 1 hand. The lightweight nature and ergonomic design of the hand piece allows the operation of the device without user fatigue. Its design allows the practiti1r an unobstructed view of the treatment area, which reduces the possibility of unintended damage to the skin and can increase the speed of treatment. The 1064nm NdYAG hand piece also incorporates our cooling system, providing integrated pre and post treatment cooling of the treatment area through a temperature controlled copper plate to protect the outer layer of the skin. The hand piece is available in either a fixed 10 millimeter spot size for our CoolGlide CV system, or a user controlled variable 3, 5, 7 or 10 millimeter spot size for our CoolGlide Excel and CoolGlide Vantage systems. GenesisPlus Hand Piece Our GenesisPlus system launched in 2010 delivers 1064 nm laser energy to the treatment area for the temporary increase of clear nail in patients with onychomycosis and for the treatment of fine wrinkles, diffuse redness and rosacea. This lightweight 1064nm NdYAG hand piece consists of an energy delivery comp1nt, housing an optical fiber and lens. The hand piece includes a non contact temperature sensor to monitor the treatment area temperature. In addition, the hand piece includes dual coaxial aiming beams that facilitate consistent treatments by maintaining the correct distance of the hand piece to the skin. This hand piece offers a single 5 mm spot size. Pulsed Light Hand Piece The LP560 , ProWave 770 , ProWave LX , AcuTip 500 , and LimeLight hand pieces are designed to produce a pulse of light over a wavelength spectrum to treat discoloration such as age and sun spots and other dyschromia. The hand pieces can also be used for hair removal, and treatment of superficial facial vessels. The hand pieces each consist of a custom flashlamp, proprietary wavelength filter, closed loop power control and embedded temperature monitor, and weigh approximately 13 ounces. The filter in the AcuTip 500 eliminates long and short wavelengths, transmitting only the therapeutic range required for safe and effective treatment. The filter in the LP560 , ProWave 770 , ProWave LX , and LimeLight eliminates short wavelengths, allowing longer wavelengths to be transmitted to the treatment area. In addition, the wavelength spectrum of the ProWave 770 and the LimeLight can be shifted based on the setting of the control console. Our power control includes a monitoring system to ensure that the desired energy level is delivered. The hand pieces protect the epidermis by regulating the temperature of the hand piece window through the embedded temperature monitor. These hand pieces are available on the xeo and solera platforms. Titan Hand Piece The Titan hand pieces are designed to produce a sustained pulse of light over a wavelength spectrum tailored to induce heating in the dermis. We are aware that some practiti1rs use the Titan hand piece to treat skin laxity (although the hand piece is cleared in the U.S. by the FDA only for deep dermal heating). The hand piece consists of a custom light source, proprietary wavelength filter, closed loop power control, sapphire cooling window and embedded temperature monitor, and weighs approximately 3 pounds. The temperature of the epidermis is controlled by using a sapphire window to provide cooling before, during and after the delivery of energy to the treatment site. We offer 2 different Titan hand pieces Titan V and Titan XL . Titan V Titan V has a treatment tip that extends beyond the hand piece housing to provide enhanced visibility of the skin surface to effectively treat delicate areas such as the skin around the eyes and nose. Titan XL Titan XL , like the Titan V , has a treatment tip that extends beyond the housing for improved visibility. It also has a larger treatment spot size to treat larger body areas faster, such as the arms, abdomen and legs. The Titan hand pieces can be used on the xeo and solera platforms. The Titan hand piece requires a periodic refilling process, which includes the replacement of the optical source, after a set number of pulses have been used. This provides us with a source of recurring revenue. Pearl Hand Piece The Pearl hand piece, introduced in 2007, is designed to treat fine lines, uneven texture and dyschromia through the application of proprietary YSGG laser technology. This hand piece can safely remove a small portion of the epidermis, while coagulating the remaining epidermis, leading to new collagen growth. The Pearl hand piece consists of a custom monolithic laser source, scanner and power monitoring electronics. The scanner includes multiple scan patterns to allow simple and fast treatments of the face. The hand piece includes an attachment for a smoke evacuator, allowing the practiti1r to use 1 hand during treatment. 9 Table of Contents Pearl Fractional Hand Piece The Pearl Fractional hand piece, introduced in 2008, also uses proprietary YSGG technology and is designed to treat wrinkles and deep dermal imperfections (although it is cleared in the U.S. by the FDA only for skin resurfacing and coagulation). This hand piece penetrates the deep dermis producing a series of micro columns across the skin, which can result in the removal of damaged tissue and the production of new collagen. The Pearl Fractional hand piece consists of a custom monolithic laser source, scanner and power monitoring electronics. The scanner includes multiple scan patterns to allow simple and fast treatments of the face. The hand piece includes an attachment for a smoke evacuator, allowing the practiti1r to use 1 hand during treatment. Upgrades Our excel V, xeo and solera platforms are multi application products that are designed to allow our customers to cost effectively upgrade to our newest technologies, which provide our customers the option to add applications to their system and provides us with a source of additional revenue, which we classify as Product revenue. Service We offer post warranty services to our customers through extended service contracts that cover preventive maintenance and or replacement parts and labor, or by direct billing for detachable hand piece replacements, parts and labor. These post warranty services serve as additional sources of recurring revenue from our installed base. Hand Piece Refills We treat our customer purchase of replacement Titan or truSculpt hand pieces as refill revenue, which provides us with a source of recurring revenue from existing customers. Following the launch of truSculpt product in 2012, we charged customers for hand piece refills. However, beginning in the third quarter of 2013 we include truSculpt refills as part of our standard warranty and service contract product offerings. Skincare We distribute ZO Skin Health, Inc. ( ZO ) physician dispensed, topical skincare products. Through the second quarter of 2014, we also distributed Merz Radiesse dermal filler product to physicians in the Japanese market. Our Applications and Procedures Our products are designed to allow the practiti1r to select an appropriate combination of energy level, spot size and pulse duration for each treatment. The ability to manipulate the combinations of these parameters allows our customers to treat the broadest range of conditions available with a single energy based system. Tattoo Removal Our enlighten system that delivers the picosecond and nanosecond pulse duration, as well as our myQ Q switched laser, are used for tattoo removal, the treatment of benign pigmented lesions, and laser skin toning that we refer to as PicoGenesis. Non Invasive Body Contouring Our truSculpt technology allows practiti1rs to apply a hand piece directly to the skin and deliver high powered RF energy that results in the deep and uniform heating of the subcutaneous fat tissue at sustained therapeutic temperatures. This heating can cause selective destruction of fat cells, which are eliminated from the treatment area through the body natural wound healing processes. The treatment takes approximately 45 minutes and 2 or more treatments may be required to obtain the desired aesthetic results. Our CE Mark allows us to market the truSculpt in the European Union, Australia and certain other countries outside the U.S. for fat reduction, body shaping and body contouring. In the U.S., truSculpt has a 510(k) clearance for the temporary reduction in circumference of the abdomen, and elevating tissue temperature for the treatment of selected medical conditions such as relief of pain, muscle spasms, increase in local circulation, and the temporary improvement in the appearance of cellulite. Hair Removal Our laser technology allows our customers to treat all skin types and hair thicknesses. Our 1064 nm NdYAG and 755 nm Alexandrite lasers permits energy to safely penetrate through the epidermis of any skin type and into the dermis where the hair follicle is located. Using the universal graphic user interface on our control console, the practiti1r sets parameters to deliver therapeutic energy with a large spot size and variable pulse durations, allowing the practiti1r to treat fine or coarse hair. Our 1064nm NdYAG and 755 nm Alexandrite hand pieces allow our customers to treat all skin types, while our ProWave 770 and ProWave LX hand pieces, with pulsed light technology, treat the majority of skin types quickly and effectively. For hair removal treatments, the treatment site on the skin is first cleaned and shaved. The practiti1r then applies a thin layer of gel to improve contact and aid gliding of the hand piece across the skin. If using the CoolGlide 1064nm NdYAG hand piece, the hand piece is applied directly to the skin to cool the area to be treated, then moved and a laser pulse is delivered to the pre cooled area. To remove hair using the excel HR, excel V, ProWave 770 and ProWave LX hand pieces, cooling is provided by a sapphire window placed directly on the skin, allowing the pulse of light to be applied while the treatment area is being cooled. In the case of both hand pieces, delivery of light which is converted to heat destroys the hair follicles and prevents hair re growth. This procedure is then repeated at the next treatment site on the body, and can be d1 in a gliding motion to increase treatment speed. Patients receive 3 to six treatments on average. Each treatment can take between five minutes to 1 hour depending on the size of the area and the condition being treated. On average, there are six to eight weeks between treatments. 10 Table of Contents Vascular Lesions Our laser technology allows our customers to treat the widest range of aesthetic vein conditions, including spider and reticular veins and small facial veins. Our CoolGlide and x eo 1064nm NdYAG hand piece adjustable spot size of 3, 5, 7 or 10 millimeters; the e xcel V 1064 nm and 532 nm hand piece with adjustable spot sizes from 15 to 12 mm; and the excel HR 1064 nm and 755 nm hand pieces with adjustable spot sizes from 3 mm to 18 mm, each allows the practiti1r to control treatment depth to target different sized veins. Selection of the appropriate energy level and pulse duration ensures effective treatment of the intended target. Our AcuTip 500 hand piece, with its 6 mm spot size, uses pulsed light technology and is designed for the treatment of facial vessels. The vein treatment procedure using the 1064nm NdYAG hand piece is performed in a substantially similar manner to the laser hair removal procedure. The laser hand piece is used to cool the treatment area both before and after the laser pulse has been applied. With the e xcel V and excel HR hand pieces, the cooling can be performed before, during and after delivery of the laser pulse. With the AcuTip 500 hand piece, the pulse of light is delivered while the treatment area is being cooled with the sapphire tip. The delivered energy damages the vein and, over time, it is absorbed by the body. Patients receive on average between 1 and six treatments, with six weeks or longer between treatments. Skin Rejuvenation Our NdYAG laser, picosecond laser and other energy based technologies allow our customers to perform non invasive and minimally invasive treatments that reduce redness, dyschromia, fine lines and wrinkles, improve skin texture, and treat other aesthetic conditions. Texture , Lines and Wrinkles When using a 1064nm NdYAG laser to improve skin texture and treat fine lines, cooling is not applied and the hand piece is held directly above the skin. A large number of pulses are directed at the treatment site, repeatedly covering an area, such as the cheek. By delivering many pulses of laser light to a treatment area, a gentle heating of the dermis occurs and collagen growth is stimulated to rejuvenate the skin and reduce wrinkles. Patients typically receive four to six treatments for this procedure. The treatment typically takes less than a half hour and there are typically 2 to four weeks between treatments. When treating texture and fine lines with a Pearl hand piece, the hand piece is held at a controlled distance from the skin and the scanner delivers a preset pattern of spots to the treatment area. Cooling is not applied to the epidermis during the treatment. The energy delivered by the hand piece ablates a portion of the epidermis while leaving a coagulated portion that will gently peel off over the course of a few days. Heat is also delivered into the dermis, which can result in the production of new collagen. Treatment of the full face can usually be performed in 15 to 30 minutes. Patients receive on average between 1 and 3 treatments at monthly intervals. When treating wrinkles and deep dermal imperfections with a Pearl Fractional hand piece, the hand piece is held at a controlled distance from the skin and the scanner delivers a preset pattern of spots to the treatment area. Cooling is not applied to the epidermis during the treatment. The energy delivered by the hand piece penetrates the deep dermis producing a series of micro columns across the skin, which can result in the removal of damaged tissue and the production of new collagen. Treatment of the full face can usually be performed in less than an hour. Patients receive on average between 1 and 3 treatments at monthly intervals. Our CE Mark allows us to market Pearl Fractional in the European Union, Australia and certain other countries outside the U.S. for the treatment of wrinkles and deep dermal imperfections. However, in the U.S. we have a 510(k) clearance only for skin resurfacing and coagulation. Toenail Fungus In addition to performing skin rejuvenation, our CE Mark allows us to market GenesisPlus in the European Union, Australia and certain other countries outside the U.S. for the treatment of onychomycosis ( toenail fungus ). Tiny pulses of light from an NdYAG laser pass through the toenail to the fungus underneath, which is irradiated without any damage to the surrounding nail or skin. The GenesisPlus has dual aiming beams that facilitate consistent treatments by maintaining the correct distance of the hand piece to the skin. In addition, during the treatment an integrated sensor is used to actively monitor the temperature of the treatment area. In the U.S. we have 510(k) clearance to market GenesisPlus for the temporary increase of clear nail in patients with onychomycosis. Dyschromia Our pulsed light technologies allow our customers to safely and effectively treat red and brown dyschromia (skin discoloration), benign pigmented lesions, and rosacea. The practiti1r delivers a narrow spectrum of light to the surface of the skin through our LP560 or LimeLight hand pieces. These hand pieces include 1 of our proprietary wavelength filters, which reduce the energy level required for therapeutic effect and minimize the risk of skin injury. In treating benign pigmented lesions with a pulsed light technology, the hand piece is placed directly on the skin and then the light pulse is triggered. The cells forming the pigmented lesion absorb the light energy, darken and then flake off over the course of 2 to 3 weeks. Several treatments may be required to completely remove the lesion. The treatment takes a few minutes per area treated and there are typically 3 to four weeks between treatments. 11 Table of Contents The 532 nm wavelength green laser option of the e xcel V and enlighten systems, as well as the 755 nm infrared wavelength of the excel HR , can be used to treat benign pigmented lesions in substantially the same way as described above with the pulsed light devices. Practiti1rs can also treat dyschromia and other skin conditions with our Pearl hand piece. During these treatments, the heat delivered by the Pearl hand piece will remove the outer layer of the epidermis while coagulating a portion of the epidermis. That coagulated portion will gently peel off over the course of a few days, revealing a new layer of skin underneath. Treatment of the full face can usually be performed in 15 to 30 minutes. Patients receive on average between 1 and 3 treatments at monthly intervals. Skin Laxity Our Titan technology allows our customers to use deep dermal heating to tighten lax skin. The practiti1r delivers a spectrum of light to the skin through our Titan hand piece. This hand piece includes our proprietary light source and wavelength filter which tailors the delivered spectrum of light to provide heating at the desired depth in the skin. In treating skin laxity, the hand piece is placed directly on the skin and then the light pulse is triggered. A sustained pulse causes significant heating in the dermis. This heating can cause immediate collagen contraction while also stimulating long term collagen regrowth. Several treatments may be required to obtain the desired degree of tightening of the skin. The treatment of a full face can take over an hour and there are typically four weeks between treatments. Our CE Mark allows us to market the Titan in the European Union, Australia and certain other countries outside the U.S. for the treatment of wrinkles through skin tightening. However, in the U.S. we have a 510(k) clearance for only deep dermal heating. Sales and Marketing In the U.S. we market and sell our products primarily through a direct sales organization. Generally, each direct sales employee is assigned a specific territory. As of December 31, 2016, we had a U.S. direct sales force of 52 employees. We internally manage our U.S. and Canadian sales organization as 1 North American sales region with 58 territories as of December 31, 2016. International sales are generally made through a worldwide distributor ne2rk in over 40 countries, as well as a direct international sales force of 34 employees, as of December 31, 2016. As of December 31, 2016, we had direct sales offices in Australia, Belgium, Canada, France, Hong Kong, Japan, Spain (until January 2017), Switzerland and the United Kingdom. Our international revenue as a percentage of total revenue represented 45% in 2016, 48% in 2015 and 55% in 2014. We also sell certain Item 1ike Titan hand piece refills and marketing brochures through the internet. Although specific customer requirements can vary depending on applications, customers generally demand quality, performance, ease of use, and high productivity in relation to the cost of ownership. We have responded to these customer demands by introducing new products focused on these requirements in the markets we serve. Specifically, we believe that we introduce new products and applications that are innovative, address the specific aesthetic procedures in demand, and are upgradeable on our customers existing systems. In addition, we provide attractive upgrade pricing to new product families. To increase market penetration, in addition to marketing to the core specialties of plastic surgeons and dermatologists, we also market to non core practiti1rs. We seek to establish strong ongoing relationships with our customers through the upgradeability of our products, sales of extended service contracts, the refilling of Titan hand pieces, ongoing training and support, and distributing (in Japan only) skincare products. We primarily target our marketing efforts to practiti1rs through office visits, workshops, trade shows, webinars and trade journals. We also market to potential patients through brochures, workshops and our website. In addition, we offer clinical forums with recognized expert panelists to promote advanced treatment techniques using our products to further enhance customer loyalty and uncover new sales opportunities. Competition Our industry is subject to intense competition. Our products compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as electrolysis, Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, microdermabrasion and sclerotherapy. Our products also compete against laser and other energy based products offered by public companies, such as Cynosure (Hologic announced its intent to acquire Cynosure in February 2017), Elen (in Italy), XIO Group (acquired Lumenis in September 2015), Syneron, Zeltiq (Allergan announced its intent to acquire Zeltiq in February 2017), Valeant (acquired Solta in January 2014), as well as private companies, including Alma, Sciton, and several others. Competition among providers of laser and other energy based devices for the aesthetic market is characterized by extensive research efforts and innovative technology. While we attempt to protect our products through patents and other intellectual property rights, there are few barriers to entry that would prevent new entrants or existing competitors from developing products that would compete directly with ours. There are many companies, both public and private, that are developing innovative devices that use both energy based and alternative technologies. Some of these competitors have greater resources than we do or product applications for certain sub markets in which we do not participate. Additional competitors may enter the market, and we are likely to compete with new companies in the future. To compete effectively, we have to demonstrate that our products are attractive alternatives to other devices and treatments by differentiating our products on the basis of performance, brand name, service and price. We have encountered, and expect to continue to encounter, potential customers who, due to existing relationships with our competitors, are committed to, or prefer, the products offered by these competitors. Competitive pressures may result in price reductions and reduced margins for our products. 12 Table of Contents Research and Development Our research and development group develops new products and applications and builds clinical support to address unmet or underserved market needs. As of December 31, 2016, our research and development activities were conducted by a staff of 38 employees with a broad base of experience in lasers, optoelectronics, software and other fields. We have developed relationships with outside contract engineering and design consultants, giving our team additional technical and creative breadth. We work closely with thought leaders and customers, to understand unmet needs and emerging applications in aesthetic medicine. Research and development expenses were approximately $112 million in 2016, $10.7 million in 2015 and $10.5 million in 2014. Service and Support Our products are engineered to enable quick and efficient service and support. There are several separate comp1nts of our products, each of which can easily be removed and replaced. We believe that quick and effective delivery of service is important to our customers. As of December 31, 2016, we had a 47 person global service department. Internationally, we provide direct service support through our Australia, Belgium, Canada, France, Hong Kong, Japan, and Switzerland offices, through third party service providers in Spain and U.K, and also through a ne2rk of distributors in over 40 countries. We provide a standard 1 year warranty coverage for all of our systems. We provide initial warranties on our products to cover parts and service and offer extended service plans that vary by the type of product and the level of service desired. Our standard warranty on system consoles covers parts and service for a standard period of 1 year. From time to time, we also have promotions whereby we include a post warranty service contract with the sale of our products. Customers are notified before their initial warranty expires and are able to purchase extended service plans covering replacement parts and labor. In countries where we are represented by distributor partners, our customers are serviced through the distributor ne2rk. Distributors are generally provided 14 to 16 months warranty coverage for parts only, with labor being provided to the end customer by the distributor. In the event a customer does not purchase an extended service plan, we will offer to service the customer system and charge the customer for time and materials. With respect to the truSculpt and other hand pieces, if a customer system is out of warranty, and they have not purchased an extended service contract that covers hand piece replacements, then the customer is charged for their replacement hand piece. Our Titan hand pieces generally include a warranty for a set number of shots, instead of for a period of time. Manufacturing We manufacture our products with comp1nts and subassemblies supplied by vendors. We assemble and test each of our products at our Brisbane, California facility. Quality control, cost reduction and inventory management are top priorities of our manufacturing operations. We purchase certain comp1nts and subassemblies from a limited number of suppliers. We have flexibility with our suppliers to adjust the number of comp1nts and subassemblies as well as the delivery schedules. The forecasts we use are based on historical demands and sales projections. Lead times for comp1nts and subassemblies may vary significantly depending on the size of the order, time required to fabricate and test the comp1nts or subassemblies, specific supplier requirements and current market demand for the comp1nts and subassemblies. We reduce the potential for supply disruption by maintaining sufficient inventories and identifying additional suppliers. The time required to qualify new suppliers for some comp1nts, or to redesign them, could cause delays in our manufacturing. To date, we have not experienced significant delays in obtaining any of our comp1nts or subassemblies. We use small quantities of common cleaning products in our manufacturing operations, which are lawfully disposed of through a normal waste management program. We do not forecast any material costs due to compliance with environmental laws or regulations. We are required to manufacture our products in compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulation, or QSR. The QSR covers the methods and documentation of the design, testing, control, manufacturing, labeling, quality assurance, packaging, storage and shipping of our products. The FDA enforces the QSR through periodic unannounced inspections. We had an FDA full quality system audit for 3 weeks during March 2014. There were no significant findings as a result of this audit and our responses have been accepted by the FDA. Our failure to maintain compliance with the QSR requirements could result in the shutdown of our manufacturing operations and the recall of our products, which would have a material adverse effect on our business. In the event that 1 of our suppliers fails to maintain compliance with our quality requirements, we may have to qualify a new supplier and could experience manufacturing delays as a result. We have opted to maintain quality assurance and quality management certifications to enable us to market our products in the U.S., the member states of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association and countries which have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements with the European Union. In January 2016, we passed our surveillance recertification audit establishing compliance with the most current requirements of EN ISO 134852012, CAN CSA ISO 134852003, and MDD 93 42 EEC. Our manufacturing facility is ISO 13485 certified. 13 Table of Contents Patents and Proprietary Technology We rely on a combination of patent, copyright, trademark and trade secret laws, and non disclosure, confidentiality and invention assignment agreements to protect our intellectual property rights. As of December 31, 2016, we had 34 issued U.S. patents and 2 pending U.S. patent applications. In the U.S. and several foreign countries, we have registered our Company name and several of our product names as trademarks, including Cutera, Acutip 500 , CoolGlide , CoolGlide Excel , enlighten, Limelight , myQ , Pearl , ProWave 770 , ProWave LX , s olera , Titan , x eo and truSculpt . We may have common law rights in other product names, including e xcel V , Pearl Fractional , s olera Titan and excel HR . We intend to file for additional patents and trademarks to continue to strengthen our intellectual property rights. We licensed certain patents from Palomar (acquired by Cynosure in 2013) and paid ongoing royalties based on sales of applicable hair removal products. The royalty rate on these products ranged from 375% to 7.50% of revenue. The remaining U.S. patents expired in February 2015 and the remaining international patents expired in February 2016. As a result, all our revenue from February 2016 onwards will not be subject to royalties. Our revenue from systems that do not include hair removal capabilities (such as our solera Titan , xeo SA , GenesisPlus , myQ, excel V and enlighten ), and other revenue from service contracts, Titan , skincare products, were not subject to these royalties. In addition, in 2006 we capitalized $12 million as an intangible asset representing the ongoing license for these patents, which was being amortized on a straight line basis over their expected useful life of 9 10 years. Our employees and technical consultants are required to execute confidentiality agreements in connection with their employment and consulting relationships with us. We also require them to agree to disclose and assign to us all inventions conceived in connection with the relationship. We cannot provide any assurance that employees and consultants will abide by the confidentiality or assignability terms of their agreements. Despite measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties may copy aspects of our products or obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Government Regulation Our products are medical devices subject to extensive and rigorous regulation by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration, as well as other regulatory bodies. FDA regulations govern the following activities that we perform and will continue to perform to ensure that medical products distributed domestically or exported internationally are safe and effective for their intended uses Product design and development; Product testing; Product manufacturing; Product safety; Product labeling; Product storage; Recordkeeping; Pre market clearance or approval; Advertising and promotion; Production; Product sales and distribution; and Complaint Handling. FDA Pre market Clearance and Approval Requirements Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the U.S. will require either prior 510(k) clearance or pre market approval from the FDA. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices deemed to pose lower risks are placed in either class I or II, which requires the manufacturer to submit to the FDA a pre market notification requesting permission to commercially distribute the device. This process is generally known as 510(k) clearance. Some low risk devices are exempted from this requirement. Devices deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, or devices deemed not substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device, are placed in class III, requiring pre market approval. All of our current products are class II devices. 14 Table of Contents 510(k) Clearance Pathway When a 510(k) clearance is required, we must submit a pre market notification demonstrating that our proposed device is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for the submission of Pre Market Approval, or PMA, applications. By regulation, the FDA is required to clear or deny a 510(k), pre market notification within 90 days of submission of the application. As a practical matter, clearance often takes significantly longer. The FDA may require further information, including clinical data, to make a determination regarding substantial equivalence. Laser devices used for aesthetic procedures, such as hair removal, have generally qualified for clearance under 510(k) procedures. The following table details the indications for which we received a 510(k) clearance for our products and when these clearances were received. FDA Marketing Clearances Date Received Laser based products treatment of vascular lesions June 1999 hair removal March 2000 permanent hair reduction January 2001 treatment of benign pigmented lesions and pseudo folliculitis barbae, commonly referred to as razor bumps, and for the reduction of red pigmentation in scars June 2002 treatment of wrinkles October 2002 treatment to increase clear nail in patients with onychomycosis April 2011 expanded spot size to 5 mm for clear nail in patients with onychomycosis May 2013 addition of Alexandrite 755 nm laser wavelength for hair removal, permanent hair reduction and the treatment of vascular and benign pigmented lesions December 2013 enlighten picosecond and nanosecond 532 1064 nm for the treatment of benign pigmented lesions August 2014 enlighten picosecond and nanosecond 532 1064 nm for multi colored tattoo removal November 2014 enlighten III picosecond and nanosecond 670 nm wavelength approved for benign pigmented lesions November 2016 Pulsed light technologies treatment of pigmented lesions March 2003 hair removal and vascular treatments March 2005 Infrared Titan technology for deep dermal heating for the temporary relief of minor muscle and joint pain and for the temporary increase in local circulation where applied February 2004 Solera tabletop console for use with the Titan hand piece October 2004 for use with our pulsed light hand pieces January 2005 Pearl product for the treatment of wrinkles March 2007 Pearl Fractional product for skin resurfacing and coagulation August 2008 truSculpt radio frequency ( RF ) product for deep tissue heating for the temporary relief of minor muscle and joint pain and for a temporary improvement in the appearance of cellulite 16cm 2 to 25cm 2 hand pieces for smaller body parts April 2008 16cm 2 to 40cm 2 hand pieces for larger body parts November 2012 Product labeling and technology updates for existing clearances September 2014 Temporary reduction in circumference of the abdomen December 2016 Pre Market Approval ( PMA ) Pathway A PMA must be submitted to the FDA if the device cannot be cleared through the 510(k) process. A PMA must be supported by extensive data, including but not limited to, technical, preclinical, clinical trials, manufacturing and labeling to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and effectiveness of the device. No device that we have developed to date has required pre market approval, although development of future devices or indications may require pre market approval. 15 Table of Contents Product Modifications We have modified aspects of our products since receiving regulatory clearance, but we believe that new 510(k) clearances are not required for these modifications. After a device receives 510(k) clearance or a PMA, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, will require a new clearance or approval. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination initially, but the FDA can review any such decision and can disagree with a manufacturer determination. If the FDA disagrees with our determination not to seek a new 510(k) clearance or PMA, the FDA may retroactively require us to seek 510(k) clearance or pre market approval. The FDA could also require us to cease marketing and distribution and or recall the modified device until 510(k) clearance or pre market approval is obtained. Also, in these circumstances, we may be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. Clinical Trials When FDA approval of a class I, class II or class III device requires human clinical trials, and if the device presents a significant risk, as defined by the FDA, to human health, the device sponsor is required to file an Investigational Device Exemption, or IDE, application with the FDA and obtain IDE approval prior to commencing the human clinical trial. If the device is considered a non significant risk, IDE submission to the FDA is not required. Instead, only approval from the Institutional Review Board, or IRB, overseeing the clinical trial is required. Human clinical studies are generally required in connection with approval of class III devices and may be required for class I and II devices. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients. Clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the application is reviewed and cleared by the FDA and the appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. Future clinical trials of our products may require that we submit and obtain clearance of an IDE from the FDA prior to commencing clinical trials. The FDA, and the IRB at each institution at which a clinical trial is being performed, may suspend a clinical trial at any time for various reasons, including a belief that the subjects are being exposed to an unacceptable health risk. Pervasive and Continuing Regulation After a device is placed on the market, numerous regulatory requirements apply. These include Quality system regulations, which require manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow stringent design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during all aspects of the manufacturing process; Labeling regulations and FDA prohibitions against the promotion of products for un cleared, unapproved or off label uses; Medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if their device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if the malfunction were to recur; and Post market surveillance regulations, which apply when necessary to protect the public health or to provide additional safety and effectiveness data for the device. The FDA has broad post market and regulatory enforcement powers. We are subject to unannounced inspections by the FDA and the Food and Drug Branch of the California Department of Health Services, or CDHS, to determine our compliance with the QSR and other regulations, and these inspections may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. In the past, our prior facility has been inspected, and observations were noted. There were no findings that involved a material violation of regulatory requirements. Our responses to these observations have been accepted by the FDA and CDHS, and we believe that we are in substantial compliance with the QSR. Our current manufacturing facility has been inspected by the FDA and the CDHS. The FDA and the CDHS noted observations, but there were no findings that involved a material violation of regulatory requirements. Our responses to those observations have been accepted by the FDA and CDHS. We are also regulated under the Radiation Control for Health and Safety Act, which requires laser products to comply with performance standards, including design and operation requirements, and manufacturers to certify in product labeling and in reports to the FDA that their products comply with all such standards. The law also requires laser manufacturers to file new product and annual reports, maintain manufacturing, testing and sales records, and report product defects. Various warning labels must be affixed and certain protective devices installed, depending on the class of the product. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may include any of the following sanctions Warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; Repair, replacement, recall or seizure of our products; Operating restrictions or partial suspension or total shutdown of production; Refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or pre market approval of new products, new intended uses, or modifications to existing products; Withdrawing 510(k) clearance or pre market approvals that have already been granted; and Criminal prosecution. 16 Table of Contents The FDA also has the authority to require us to repair, replace or refund the cost of any medical device that we have manufactured or distributed. If any of these events were to occur, they could have a material adverse effect on our business. We are also subject to a wide range of federal, state and local laws and regulations, including those related to the environment, health and safety, land use and quality assurance. We believe that compliance with these laws and regulations as currently in effect will not have a material adverse effect on our capital expenditures, earnings and competitive and financial position. International International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign governmental regulations, which vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain clearance or approval by a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA clearance or approval, and the requirements may be different. The primary regulatory environment in Europe is that of the European Union, which consists of a 28 countries encompassing most of the major countries in Europe. The member states of the European Free Trade Association have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements and allow the marketing of medical devices that meet European Union requirements. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and European Standardization Committees have promulgated voluntary standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms with the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the member states of the European Union, the member states of the European Free Trade Association and countries which have entered into a Mutual Recognition Agreement. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the type and class of the product, but normally involves a combination of self assessment by the manufacturer and a third party assessment by a Notified Body, an independent and neutral institution appointed by a country to conduct the conformity assessment. This third party assessment may consist of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and specific testing of the manufacturer device. An assessment by a Notified Body in 1 member state of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association or 1 country which has entered into a Mutual Recognition Agreement is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout these countries. ISO 9001 and ISO 13845 certification are voluntary harmonized standards. Compliance establishes the presumption of conformity with the essential requirements for a CE Marking. In February 2000, our facility was awarded the ISO 9001 and EN 46001 certification. In March 2003, we received our ISO 9001 updated certification (ISO 90012000) as well as our certification for ISO 134851996 which replaced our EN 46001 certification. In March 2004, we received our ISO 134852003 certification and in March 2006, March 2010, February 2011 and January 2012 we passed ISO 13485 recertification audits. Our most recent recertification audit occurred in January 2015. We passed the audit establishing compliance with the most current requirements of EN ISO 134852012, CAN CSA ISO 134852003, and MDD 93 42 EEC. Employees As of December 31, 2016, we had 297 employees, compared to 262 employees as of December 31, 2015. Of the 297 employees at December 31, 2016, 122 were in sales and marketing, 69 in manufacturing operations, 47 in technical service, 38 in research and development and 21 in general and administrative. We believe that our future success will depend in part on our continued ability to attract, hire and retain qualified personnel. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union, and we believe our employee relations are good. Available Information We are subject to the reporting requirements under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Consequently, we are required to file reports and information with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or SEC, including reports on the following forms annual report on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. These reports and other information concerning the company may be accessed through the SEC website at www.sec.gov. Such filings, as well as our charters for our Audit, Compensation, and Nominating and Corporate Governance Committees and our Code of Ethics are available on our website at www.cutera.com. In the event that we grant a waiver under our Code of Ethics to any of our officers and directors, we will publish it on our website. Information contained on, or that can be accessed through, our website does not constitute part of this report and inclusions of our website address in this report are inactive textual references only. ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS We operate in a rapidly changing economic and technological environment that presents numerous risks, many of which are driven by factors that we cannot control or predict. Our business, financial condition and results of operations may be impacted by a number of factors. In addition to the factors discussed elsewhere in this report, the following risks and uncertainties could materially harm our business, financial condition or results of operations, including causing our actual results to differ materially from those projected in any forward looking statements. The following list of significant risk factors is not all inclusive or necessarily in order of importance. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us, or that we currently deem immaterial, also may materially adversely affect us in future periods. You should carefully consider these risks and uncertainties before investing in our securities. 17 Table of Contents We may be unable to maintain profitability. Although we had profitable third and fourth quarters in 2016 and gave financial guidance that we expect to be profitable for the full year of 2017, there can be no assurance that we will be able to maintain profitability. Given our recent operating history of very few profitable quarters, we cannot be certain that we will be able to maintain profitability in the future and you should not rely on our operating results for any prior quarterly or annual periods as an indication of our future operating performance. Any predictions about the performance of our operations in the future may not be as accurate as they could be if we had a longer history of profitability. Revenue growth in our business is driven by several factors and 1 such factor is new product introductions. Our ability to sustain profitability depends on our ability to introduce new products that are adopted by our customers and on the extent to which we can increase revenue and control our costs to be able to leverage our expenses. In addition, we need to be able to counter any unforeseen difficulties, complications, product delays or other unknown factors that may require additional expenditures. Because of the numerous risks and uncertainties associated with our growth prospects, product development, sales and marketing and other efforts, unforeseen litigation expenses, etc., we are unable to predict the extent of our future profitability or losses. We rely heavily on our sales professionals to market and sell our products worldwide. If we are unable to hire, effectively train, manage, improve the productivity of, and retain our sales professionals, our business will be harmed, which would impair our future revenue and profitability. Our success largely depends on our ability to hire, train, manage and improve the productivity levels of our sales professionals worldwide. Because of our focus on non core practiti1rs in the past, several of our sales professionals do not have established relationships with the core market, consisting of dermatologists and plastic surgeons, or where those relationships exist, they are not very strong. We have experienced direct sales employee and sales management turnover in North America, Japan, and Europe. Competition for sales professionals who are familiar and trained to sell in the aesthetic equipment market continues to be strong. As a result, we have lost some of our sales people to our competitors. Our industry is characterized by a few established companies that compete vigorously for talented sales professionals. Further, as the economy in North America has rebounded from the recent recession, some of those sales professionals have left our company for jobs that they perceive to be better opportunities, both within and outside of the aesthetic industry. However, we have also hired a record number of new sales people, including several from our competitors. Several of our sales employees and sales management have been recently hired or recently transferred into different roles, and it will take time for them to be fully trained to improve their productivity. In addition, due to the competition for sales professionals in our industry, we have recruited sales professionals from outside the industry. Sales professionals from outside the industry take longer to train and to become familiar with our products and the procedures in which they are used. As a result of a lack of industry knowledge, these sales professionals may take longer to become productive members of our sales force. We train our existing and recently recruited sales professionals to better understand our existing and new product technologies and how they can be positi1d against our competitors products. These initiatives are intended to improve the productivity of our sales professionals and our revenue and profitability. It takes time for the sales professionals to become productive following their training and there can be no assurance that the recently recruited sales professionals will be adequately trained in a timely manner, or that our direct sales productivity will improve, or that we will not experience significant levels of attrition in the future. Measures we implement in an effort to recruit, retain, train and manage our sales professionals, strengthen their relationships with core market physicians, and improve their productivity may not be successful and may instead contribute to instability in our operations, additional departures from our sales organization, or further reduce our revenue and harm our business. If we are not able to improve the productivity and retention of our North American and international sales professionals, then our total revenue, profitability and stock price may be adversely impacted. The aesthetic equipment market is characterized by rapid innovation. To compete effectively, we must develop and or acquire new products, market them successfully, and identify new markets for our technology. We have created products to apply our technology to body contouring, hair removal, treatment of veins, tattoo removal, and skin rejuvenation, including the treatment of diffuse redness, skin laxity, fine lines, wrinkles, skin texture, pore size and benign pigmented lesions, etc. For example, in the fourth quarter of 2014, we launched enlighten , a dual wavelength, dual pulse duration tattoo removal and benign pigmented lesions treatment system featuring picosecond technology . To grow in the future, we must continue to develop and or acquire new and innovative aesthetic products and applications, identify new markets, and successfully launch the newly acquired or developed product offerings. 18 Table of Contents To successfully expand our product offerings, we must, among other things Develop and acquire new products that either add to or significantly improve our current product offerings; Convince our existing and prospective customers that our product offerings are an attractive revenue generating addition to their practice; Sell our product offerings to a broad customer base; Identify new markets and alternative applications for our technology; Protect our existing and future products with defensible intellectual property; and Satisfy and maintain all regulatory requirements for commercialization. Historically, product introductions have been a significant comp1nt of our financial performance. To be successful in the aesthetics industry, we need to continue to innovate. Our business strategy has therefore been based, in part, on our expectation that we will continue to increase our product offerings. We need to continue to devote substantial research and development resources to make new product introductions, which can be costly and time consuming to our organization. We also believe that, to increase revenue from sales of new products, we need to continue to develop our clinical support, further expand and nurture relationships with industry thought leaders and increase market awareness of the benefits of our new products. However, even with a significant investment in research and development, we may be unable to continue to develop, acquire or effectively launch and market new products and technologies regularly, or at all. If we fail to successfully commercialize new products, our business may be harmed. While we attempt to protect our products through patents and other intellectual property, there are few barriers to entry that would prevent new entrants or existing competitors from developing products that compete directly with ours. We expect that any competitive advantage we may enjoy from current and future innovations may diminish over time as companies successfully respond to our, or create their own, innovations. Consequently, we believe that we will have to continuously innovate and improve our products and technology to compete successfully. If we are unable to innovate successfully, our products could become obsolete and our revenue could decline as our customers and prospects purchase our competitors products. Demand for our products in any of our markets could be weakened by several factors, including Inability to develop and market our products to the core market specialties of dermatologists and plastic surgeons; Poor financial performance of market segments that attempt to introduce aesthetic procedures to their businesses; The inability to differentiate our products from those of our competitors; Reduced patient demand for elective aesthetic procedures; Failure to build and maintain relationships with opinion leaders within the various market segments; An increase in malpractice lawsuits that result in higher insurance costs; and The lack of credit financing, or an increase in the cost of borrowing, for some of our potential customers. If we do not achieve anticipated demand for our products, there could be a material adverse effect on our total revenue, profitability, employee retention and stock price. We depend on skilled and experienced personnel to operate our global business effectively. Changes to management or the inability to recruit, hire, train and retain qualified personnel , could harm our ability to successfully manage , develop and expand our business , which would impair our future revenue and profitability. Our success largely depends on the skills, experience and efforts of our officers and other key employees. The loss of any of our executive officers could weaken our management expertise and harm our business, and we may not be able to find adequate replacements on a timely basis, or at all. Except for Change of Control and Severance Agreements for our executive officers and a few key employees, we do not have employment contracts with any of our officers or other key employees. Any of our officers and other key employees may terminate their employment at any time and their knowledge of our business and industry would be difficult to replace. We do not have a succession plan in place for each of our officers and key employees. In addition, we do not maintain key person life insurance policies covering any of our employees. We recently hired a new Chief Executive Officer and President ( CEO ), who also is on our Board of Directors. His prior experience is primarily with medical device companies, but not within our aesthetics industry specifically. In addition, he has never been a public company CEO. Recently hired executives may view the business differently than prior members of management, and over time may make changes to the existing personnel and their responsibilities, our strategic focus, operations or business plans. We can give no assurances that we will be able to properly manage any such shift in focus, or that any changes to our business, would ultimately prove successful. In addition, leadership transitions and management changes can be inherently difficult to manage and may cause uncertainty or a disruption to our business or may increase the likelihood of turnover in key officers and employees. Our success depends in part on having a successful leadership team. If we cannot effectively manage the leadership transitions and management changes, it could make it more difficult to successfully operate our business and pursue our business goals. We cannot ensure that we will be able to retain the services of any members of our executive officers or other key employees. If we do not succeed in attracting well qualified employees, retaining and motivating existing employees or integrating new executives and employees, our business could be materially and adversely affected. 19 Table of Contents Our ability to retain our skilled labor force and our success in attracting and hiring new skilled employees are critical factors in determining whether we will be successful in the future. We may not be able to meet our future hiring needs or retain existing personnel. The staff we hire to perform administrative functions may become stretched due to our increased growth and they may not be able to perform their jobs effectively or efficiently as a result. We may face particularly significant challenges and risks in hiring, training, managing and retaining engineering and sales and marketing employees. Failure to attract, train and retain personnel, particularly technical and sales and marketing personnel, would materially harm our ability to compete effectively and grow our business. The lease for our corporate headquarter s and manufacturing facility in California, U.S.A., expires on December 31, 2017. We cannot provide assurance that we will be able to renew our lease for this facility at a reasonable increased rat e , and if not , that we will be able to relocate to a new facility that meets our needs upon terms that we find acceptable. We occupy office space in facilities leased from a commercial landlord, and we cannot provide any assurance that we will be able to remain in the same space after our lease expires on December 31, 2017. There is significant demand for leased facilities in the San Francisco Bay area and leasing costs have increased significantly over the last few years. We can provide no assurance that we will be able to renew our lease for this facility at a reasonable increased rate, or that we will be able to relocate to a new facility that meets our needs and upon terms that we find acceptable. Whether we remain in our current facility or move to a new facility, we expect to pay more per square foot for space than we are currently paying. If we move to a new facility, we anticipate that it will be in the same general vicinity as our current location. However, we may experience loss of key employees, incur relocation costs and capital expenditures relating to the process of evaluating our options , negotiating a new lease, moving, and purchasing furniture, fixtures and equipment. Searching for a new facility and managing a relocation process will require expense, time and attention from members of management. Further, we may incur related expenses, such as those associated with regulatory approvals or clearances to manufacture our products, and may encounter disruption of operations related to the move, all of which could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations until we are fully operational in a new facility . Macroeconomic political and market conditions, and catastrophic events may adversely affect our business, results of operations, financial condition and stock price. Our business is influenced by a range of factors that are beyond our control, including General macro economic and business conditions in our key markets of North America, Japan, Asia (excluding Japan), the Middle East, Europe and Australia; The lack of credit financing, or an increase in the cost of borrowing, for some of our potential customers due to increasing interest rates. The overall demand for our products by the core market specialties of dermatologists and plastic surgeons; The timing and success of new product introductions by us or our competitors or any other change in the competitive landscape of the market for non surgical aesthetic procedures, including consolidation among our competitors; The level of awareness of aesthetic procedures and the market adoption of our products; Changes in our pricing policies or those of our competitors; Governmental budgetary constraints or shifts in government spending priorities; General political developments, both domestic and in our foreign markets, including economic and political uncertainty caused by the recent election of a new U.S. president; Natural disasters; Currency exchange rate fluctuations; and Any trade restrictions or higher import taxes that may be imposed by foreign countries against products sold internationally by U.S. companies. Macroeconomic developments, like global recessions and financial crises could negatively affect our business, operating results or financial condition which, in turn, could adversely affect our stock price. A general weakening of, and related declining corporate confidence in, the global economy or the curtailment in government or corporate spending could cause current or potential customers to reduce their budgets or be unable to fund product or upgrade application purchases, which could cause customers to delay, decrease or cancel purchases of our products and services or cause customers not to pay us or to delay paying us for previously purchased products and services. 20 Table of Contents In addition, political unrest in regions like the Middle East, terrorist attacks around the globe and the potential for other hostilities in various parts of the world, potential public health crises and natural disasters continue to contribute to a climate of economic and political uncertainty that could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition, including our revenue growth and profitability. Macroeconomic declines, negative political developments, adverse market conditions and catastrophic events may cause a decline in our revenue, negatively affect our operating results, adversely affect our cash flow and could result in a decline in our stock price. The price of our common stock has increased by over 85% in the six months ended February 28, 2017 and may fluctuate substantially due to several factors, some of which are discussed below. Further, we have a limited number of shares of common stock outstanding, a large portion of which is held by a small number of investors, which could result in the increase in volatility of our stock price. The price of our common stock has increased by over 85% in the six months ended February 28, 2017 due in part to our recent improved revenue and profitability performance, the purchase of 2 of our competitors (Cynosure and Zeltiq) in February 2017, the financial guidance we communicated to the investor community in February 2017, repurchases of our stock, the overall rise in the stock market following the conclusion of the U.S. presidential election in November 2016 and other factors. As of December 31, 2016, approximately 50% of our outstanding shares of common stock were held by 10 institutional investors. As a result of our relatively small public float, our common stock may be less liquid than the stock of companies with broader public ownership. Among other things, trading of a relatively small volume of our common stock may have a greater impact on the trading price for our shares than would be the case if our public float were larger. The public market price of our common stock has in the past fluctuated substantially and, due to the current concentration of stockholders, may continue to do so in the future. The market price for our common stock could also be affected by a number of other factors, including Litigation surrounding executive compensation has increased. If we are involved in a lawsuit related to compensation matters or any other matters not covered by our D&O insurance, there could be material expenses involved, fines, or remedial actions which could negatively affect our stock price; The general market conditions unrelated to our operating performance; Sales of large blocks of our common stock, including sales by our executive officers, directors and our large institutional investors; Quarterly variations in our, or our competitors , results of operations; Actual or anticipated changes or fluctuations in our results of operations; Actual or anticipated changes in analysts estimates, investors perceptions, recommendations by securities analysts or our failure to achieve analysts estimates; The announcement of new products, service enhancements, distributor relationships or acquisitions by us or our competitors; The announcement of the departure of a key employee or executive officer by us or our competitors; Regulatory developments or delays concerning our, or our competitors products; and The initiation of any other litigation by us or against us. Actual or perceived instability and or volatility in our stock price could reduce demand from potential buyers of our stock, thereby causing our stock price to either remain depressed or to decline further. In addition, if the market for medical device company stocks or the stock market in general experiences a loss of investor confidence, the trading price of our common stock could decline for reasons unrelated to our business, results of operations or financial condition. The trading price of our common stock might also decline in reaction to events that affect other companies in our industry even if these events do not directly affect us. In the past, following periods of volatility in the market price of a company securities, securities class action litigation has often been brought against that company. Any future securities litigation could result in substantial costs and divert our management attention and resources from our business. This could have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. We may fail to meet our publicly announced guidance or other expectations about our business and future operating results, which would cause our stock price to decline. We started providing, and may continue to provide , financial guidance about our business and future operating results in February 2017. In developing this guidance, our management must make certain assumptions and judgments about our future operating performance, including projected hiring of sales professionals, continued growth of revenue in the aesthetic device market, continue to increase our market share, reduce costs of production of our recently introduced products, and continued stability of the macro economic environment in our key markets. Furthermore, analysts and investors may develop and publish their own projections of our business, which may form a consensus about our future performance. Our business results may vary significantly from such guidance or that consensus due to a number of factors, many of which are outside of our control, and which could adversely affect our operations and operating results. Furthermore, if we make downward revisions of our previously announced guidance, or if our publicly announced guidance of future operating results fails to meet expectations of securities analysts, investors or other interested parties, the price of our common stock would decline. 21 Table of Contents To successfully market and sell our products internationally, we must address many issues that are unique to our international business. International revenue is a material comp1nt of our business strategy, and represented 45% of our total revenue in 2016 compared to 48% of our total revenue in 2015. In addition, while our international revenue in 2015 increased by 8% compared to 2014, it was negatively impacted by the appreciation of the U.S. Dollar versus the major currencies in which we transact. We depend on third party distributors and a direct sales force to sell our products internationally, and if they underperform, we may be unable to increase or maintain our level of international revenue. For example, our direct business in Japan declined in 2015 , due in part to the negative impact of foreign exchange and employee turnover, which negatively impacted our revenue from international operations. We have experienced significant turnover of our European sales team in the past. While we continue to have a direct sales and service organization in France, Belgium, Spain, Switzerland and the United Kingdom, a significant portion of our European revenue is generated through our ne2rk of distributors. Though we continue to evaluate and replace non performing distributors, and have recently brought greater focus on collaborating with our distributor partners, there can be no assurance given that these initiatives will result in improved European sourced revenue or profitability in the future . To grow our business, we will need to improve productivity in current sales territories and expand into new territories. However, direct sales productivity may not improve and distributors may not accept our business or commit the necessary resources to market and sell our products to the level of our expectations. If we are not able to increase or maintain international revenue growth, our total revenue, profitability and stock price may be adversely impacted. We believe, as we continue to manage our international operations and develop opportunities in additional international territories, our international revenue will be subject to a number of risks, including Fluctuating foreign currency exchange rates; Difficulties in staffing and managing our foreign operations; Increased management, travel, infrastructure and legal compliance costs associated with having multiple international operations; Political and economic uncertainty around the world, such as the recent U.S. presidential election and the United Kingdom referendum in June 2016 in which voters approved an exit from the European Union ( EU ), commonly referred to as Brexit ; Compliance with multiple and changing foreign laws and regulations, including foreign certification and regulatory requirements and the risks and costs of non compliance with such laws and regulations; Lengthy payment cycles and difficulty in collecting accounts receivable; Compliance with laws and regulations for foreign operations, including the United States Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the United Kingdom Bribery Act, import and export control laws, tariffs, trade barriers, economic sanctions and other regulatory or contractual limitations on our ability to sell our offerings in certain foreign markets, and the risks and costs of non compliance; Customs clearance and shipping delays; Lack of awareness of our brand in international markets; Preference for locally produced products; and Reduced protection for intellectual property rights in some countries and practical difficulties of enforcing intellectual property and contract rights abroad . If 1 or more of these risks were realized, it could require us to dedicate significant resources to remedy the situation; and if we were unsuccessful at finding a solution, we may not be able to sell our products in a particular market and, as a result, our revenue may decline. In addition, compliance with laws and regulations applicable to our international operations increases our cost of doing business in foreign jurisdictions. We may be unable to keep current with changes in foreign government requirements and laws as they change from time to time. Failure to comply with these regulations could have adverse effects on our business. In many foreign countries it is common for others to engage in business practices that are prohibited by our internal policies and procedures or United States regulations applicable to us. In addition, although we have implemented policies and procedures designed to ensure compliance with these laws and policies, there can be no assurance that all of our employees, contractors, distributors and agents will comply with these laws and policies. Violations of laws or key control policies by our employees, contractors, distributors or agents could result in delays in revenue recognition, financial reporting misstatements, fines, penalties, or the prohibition of the importation or exportation of our offerings and could have a material adverse effect on our business operations and financial results. 22 Table of Contents To successfully market and sell third party products internationally, we must address many issues that are unique to the related distribution arrangements which could reduce our available cash reserves and negatively impact our profitability. We have entered into distribution arrangements pursuant to which we utilize our sales force and distributors to sell products manufactured by other companies. In Japan, we have a non exclusive right to distribute a Q switched laser product manufactured by a third party OEM. We also have an exclusive agreement with ZO to distribute certain of their proprietary skincare products in Japan. Each of these agreements requires us to purchase annual minimum dollar amounts of their products. Each of these distribution agreements presents its own unique risks and challenges. For example, to sell skincare products we need to invest in creating a sales structure that is experienced in the sale of such products and not in capital equipment. We need to commit resources to train our sales force, obtain regulatory licenses in Japan and develop new marketing materials to promote the sale of skincare products. In addition, the minimum commitments and other costs of distributing products manufactured by these companies may exceed the incremental revenue that we derive from the sale of their products, thereby negatively impacting our profitability and reducing our available cash reserves. If we do not make the minimum purchases required in the distribution contracts, or if the third party manufacturer revokes our distribution rights, we could lose the distribution rights of the products to physicians in Japan, which would adversely affect our future revenue, results of operations, cash flows and our stock price. We offer credit terms to some qualified customers and also to leasing companies to finance the purchase of our products. In the event that any of these customers default on the amounts payable to us, our earnings may be adversely affected. We generally offer credit terms of 30 to 90 days to qualified customers. In addition, from time to time, we offer certain key international distributors, with whom we have had an extended period of relationship and payment history, payment terms that are significantly longer than the regular 30 to 90 day terms. This allows such international distributor partners to have our products in stock and provide our products to customers on a timely basis. As of December 31, 2016, 1 international distributor partner accounted for 12% of our outstanding accounts receivable balance. While we believe we have an adequate basis to ensure that we collect our accounts receivable, we cannot provide any assurance that the financial position of customers to whom we have provided payment terms will not change adversely before we receive payment. In the event that there is a default by any of the customers to whom we have provided credit terms, we may recognize a bad debt charge in our general and administrative expenses. If this bad debt charge is material, it could negatively affect our future results of operations, cash flows and our stock price. We are subject to fluctuations in the exchange rate of the U.S. Dollar and foreign currencies. Foreign currency fluctuations could result in volatility of our revenue. We do not actively hedge our exposure to currency rate fluctuations. While we transact business primarily in U.S. Dollars, and a significant proportion of our revenue is denominated in U.S. Dollars, a portion of our costs and revenue is denominated in other currencies, such as the Euro, Japanese Yen, Australian Dollar and Canadian Dollar. As a result, changes in the exchange rates of these currencies to the U.S. Dollar will affect our results from operations. For example, in 2016 the U.S. Dollar devalued against the Japanese Yen by approximately 10%, which had a significant positive foreign exchange impact on our revenue both from a re measurement gain upon the conversion of our Japanese Yen denominated revenue as well as the additional positive revenue impact due to the effective price decrease for the local customers importing our U.S. Dollar denominated systems into Japan. However in 2015, as a result of the strengthening of the U.S. Dollar, relative to many other major currencies, our products priced in U.S. Dollars became more expensive relative to products of our foreign competitors. In addition, our revenue earned in foreign currencies, such as our locally generated revenue in Japan, was negatively impacted upon translation into U.S. Dollars. Both these factors had a negative impact on our international revenue in 2015, compared to 2014. Future foreign currency fluctuations could adversely impact and increase the volatility of our revenue, profitability and stock price. Our ability to effectively compete and generate additional revenue from new and existing products depends upon our ability to distinguish our company and our products from our competitors and their products, and to develop and effectively market new and existing products. Our success is dependent on many factors, including the following Speed of new and innovative product development; Effective strategy and execution of new product launches; Identification and development of clinical support for new indications of our existing products; Product performance; Product pricing; Quality of customer support; Development of successful distribution channels, both domestically and internationally; and Intellectual property protection. 23 Table of Contents To compete effectively, we have to demonstrate that our new and existing products are attractive alternatives to other devices and treatments, by differentiating our products on the basis of such factors as innovation, performance, brand name, service, and price. This is difficult to do, especially in a crowded aesthetic market. Some of our competitors have newer or different products and more established customer relationships than we do, which could inhibit our market penetration efforts. For example, we have encountered, and expect to continue to encounter, situations where, due to pre existing relationships, potential customers decided to purchase additional products from our competitors. Potential customers also may need to recoup the cost of products that they have already purchased from our competitors and may decide not to purchase our products, or to delay such purchases. If we are unable to increase our market penetration or compete effectively, our revenue and profitability will be adversely impacted. We compete against companies that offer alternative solutions to our products, or have greater resources, a larger installed base of customers and broader product offerings than ours. In addition, increased consolidation in our industry may lead to increased competition. If we are not able to effectively compete with these companies, it may harm our business. Our industry is subject to intense competition. Our products compete against conventional non energy based treatments, such as electrolysis, Botox and collagen injections, chemical peels, microdermabrasion and sclerotherapy. Our products also compete against laser and other energy based products offered by public companies, such as Cynosure (Hologic announced its intent to acquire Cynosure in February 2017), Elen (in Italy), XIO Group (acquired Lumenis in September 2015), Syneron, Zeltiq (Allergan announced its intent to acquire Zeltiq in February 2017), Valeant (acquired Solta in January 2014), as well as private companies, including Alma, Sciton, and several others. Further, other companies could introduce new products that are in direct competition with our products. Competition with these companies could result in reduced selling prices, reduced profit margins and loss of market share, any of which would harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Recently, there has been consolidation in the aesthetic industry leading to companies combining their resources, which increases competition and could result in increased downward pressure on our product prices. For example, in February 2017, Allergan announced its intent to acquire of Zeltiq and Hologic announced its intent to acquire Cynosure, XIO Group acquired Lumenis in September 2015, and Valeant acquired Solta in January 2014 . These consolidations have resulted in increased competition and pricing pressure, as the newly combined entities have greater financial resources, deeper sales channels and greater pricing flexibility than we do. Rumored or actual consolidation of our partners and competitors will likely cause uncertainty and disruption to our business and can cause our stock price to fluctuate. The energy based aesthetic market faces competition from non energy based medical products, such as Botox and collagen injections. Other alternatives to the use of our products include electrolysis, a procedure involving the application of electric current to eliminate hair follicles, and chemical peels. We may also face competition from manufacturers of pharmaceutical and other products that have not yet been developed. If there is not sufficient consumer demand for the procedures performed with our products, practiti1r demand for our products could be inhibited, resulting in unfavorable operating results and reduced growth potential. Continued expansion of the global market for laser and other energy based aesthetic procedures is a material assumption of our business strategy. Most procedures performed using our products are elective procedures not reimbursable through government or private health insurance, with the costs borne by the patient. The decision to utilize our products may therefore be influenced by a number of factors, including Consumer disposable income and access to consumer credit, which as a result of the unstable economy, may have been significantly impacted; The cost of procedures performed using our products; The cost, safety and effectiveness of alternative treatments, including treatments which are not based upon laser or other energy based technologies and treatments which use pharmaceutical products; The success of our sales and marketing efforts; and The education of our customers and patients on the benefits and uses of our products, compared to competitors products and technologies. If, as a result of these factors, there is not sufficient demand for the procedures performed with our products, practiti1r demand for our products could be reduced, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, revenue and result of operations. 24 Table of Contents If we fail to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it could result in enforcement action by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (the FDA ) , federal and state agencies or international regulatory bodies. The FDA, state authorities and international regulatory bodies have broad enforcement powers. If we fail to comply with any U.S. law or any of the applicable regulatory requirements of the FDA, or federal or state agencies, or 1 of the international regulatory bodies, it could result in enforcement action by the agencies, which may include any of the following sanctions Warning letters, fines, injunctions, consent decrees and civil penalties; Repair, replacement, refund, recall or seizure of our products; Operating restrictions or partial suspension or total shutdown of production; Refusing our requests for 510(k) clearance or pre market approval of new products, new intended uses, or modifications to existing products; Withdrawing 510(k) clearance or pre market approvals that have already been granted; and Criminal prosecution. If we fail to obtain or maintain necessary FDA clearances for our products and indications, if clearances for future products and indications are delayed or not issued, if there are federal or state level regulatory changes or if we are found to have violated applicable FDA marketing rules, our commercial operations would be harmed. Our products are medical devices that are subject to extensive regulation in the U.S. by the FDA for manufacturing, labeling, sale, promotion, distribution and shipping. Before a new medical device, or a new use of or labeling claim for an existing product, can be marketed in the U.S., it must first receive either 510(k) clearance or pre market approval from the FDA, unless an exemption applies. Either process can be expensive and lengthy. In the event that we do not obtain FDA clearances or approvals for our products, our ability to market and sell them in the U.S. and revenue derived from the U.S. market may be adversely affected. Medical devices may be marketed in the U.S. only for the indications for which they are approved or cleared by the FDA. If we fail to comply with these regulations, it could result in enforcement action by the FDA which could lead to such consequences as warning letters, adverse publicity, criminal enforcement action and or third party civil litigation, each of which could adversely affect us. We have obtained 510(k) clearance for the indications for which we market our products. However, our clearances can be revoked if safety or effectiveness problems develop. We also are subject to Medical Device Reporting regulations, which require us to report to the FDA if our products cause or contribute to a death or serious injury, or malfunction in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. Our products are also subject to state regulations, which, in many instances, change frequently. Changes in state regulations may impede sales. For example, federal regulations allow our products to be sold to, or on the order of, licensed practiti1rs, as determined on a state by state basis. As a result, in some states, non physicians may legally purchase our products. However, a state could change its regulations at any time, thereby prohibiting sales to particular types of end users. We cannot predict the impact or effect of future legislation or regulations at the federal or state levels. Federal regulatory reforms and changes occurring at the FDA could adversely affect our ability to sell our products profitably and financial condition. From time to time, legislation is drafted and introduced in Congress that could significantly change the statutory provisions governing the clearance or approval, manufacture and marketing of a device. It is impossible to predict whether legislative changes will be enacted or FDA regulations, guidance or interpretations changed, and what the impact of such changes, if any, may be. In addition, FDA regulations and guidance are often revised or reinterpreted by the agency in ways that may significantly affect our business and our products. Changes in FDA regulations may lengthen the regulatory approval process for medical devices and require additional clinical data to support regulatory clearance for the sale and marketing of our new products. In addition, it may require additional safety monitoring, labeling changes, restrictions on product distribution or use, or other measures after the introduction of our products to market. Either of these changes lengthen the duration to market, increase our costs of doing business, adversely affect the future permitted uses of approved products, or otherwise adversely affect the market for our products. If we fail to comply with the FDA Quality System Regulation and laser performance standards, our manufacturing operations could be halted, and our business would suffer. We are currently required to demonstrate and maintain compliance with the FDA Quality System Regulation (the QSR ). The QSR is a complex regulatory scheme that covers the methods and documentation of the design, testing, control, manufacturing, labeling, quality assurance, packaging, storage and shipping of our products. Because our products involve the use of lasers, our products also are covered by a performance standard for lasers set forth in FDA regulations. The laser performance standard imposes specific record keeping, reporting, product testing and product labeling requirements. These requirements include affixing warning labels to laser products, as well as incorporating certain safety features in the design of laser products. The FDA enforces the QSR and laser performance standards through periodic unannounced inspections. We have had multiple quality system audits by the FDA, our Notified Body, and other foreign regulatory agencies, with the most recent inspection by the FDA occurring over 3 weeks in March 2014. There were no significant findings and only 1 observation as a result of this audit. Our response to this observation was accepted by the FDA. Failure to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse QSR inspection or our failure to comply with applicable laser performance standards could result in enforcement actions, including a public warning letter, a shutdown of our manufacturing operations, a recall of our products, civil or criminal penalties, or other sanctions, such as those described in the preceding paragraph, which would cause our sales and business to suffer. 25 Table of Contents We are a sponsor of Biomedical Research. As such, we are also subject to FDA regulations relating to the design and conduct of clinical trials. We are subject to unannounced BIMO audits, with the most recent inspection by FDA occurring over 5 days in August 2016. There were no significant findings and only 2 observations as a result of this audit. Our responses to these observations were accepted by the FDA. Failure to take satisfactory corrective action in response to an adverse BIMO inspection or our failure to comply with Good Clinical Practices could result in us no longer being able to sponsor Biomedical Research, the reversal of 510(k) clearances previously granted based on the results of clinical trials conducted to gain clinical data to support those 510(k) clearances, or enforcement actions, including a public warning letter, civil or criminal penalties, or other sanctions, such as those described in the preceding paragraph, which would cause our sales and business to suffer. If we modify 1 of our FDA approved devices, we may need to seek re approval, which, if not granted, would prevent us from selling our modified products or cause us to redesign our products. Any modifications to an FDA cleared device that would significantly affect its safety or effectiveness or that would constitute a major change in its intended use would require a new 510(k) clearance or possibly a pre market approval. We may not be able to obtain additional 510(k) clearance or pre market approvals for new products or for modifications to, or additional indications for, our existing products in a timely fashion, or at all. Delays in obtaining future clearance would adversely affect our ability to introduce new or enhanced products in a timely manner, which in turn would harm our revenue and future profitability. We have made modifications to our devices in the past and may make additional modifications in the future that we believe do not or will not require additional clearance or approvals. If the FDA disagrees, and requires new clearances or approvals for the modifications, we may be required to recall and to stop marketing the modified devices, which could harm our operating results and require us to redesign our products. We may be unable to obtain or maintain international regulatory qualifications or approvals for our current or future products and indications, which could harm our business. Sales of our products outside the U.S. are subject to foreign regulatory requirements that vary widely from country to country. In addition, exports of medical devices from the U.S. are regulated by the FDA. Complying with international regulatory requirements can be an expensive and time consuming process and approval is not certain. The time required for obtaining clearance or approvals, if required by other countries, may be longer than that required for FDA clearance or approvals, and requirements for such clearances or approvals may significantly differ from FDA requirements. We may be unable to obtain or maintain regulatory qualifications, clearances or approvals in other countries. We may also incur significant costs in attempting to obtain and in maintaining foreign regulatory approvals or qualifications. If we experience delays in receiving necessary qualifications, clearances or approvals to market our products outside the U.S., or if we fail to receive those qualifications, clearances or approvals, we may be unable to market our products or enhancements in international markets effectively, or at all, which could have a material adverse effect on our business and growth strategy. Any defects in the design, material or workmanship of our products may not be discovered prior to shipment to customers, which could materially increase our expenses, adversely impact profitability and harm our business. The design of our products is complex. To manufacture them successfully, we must procure quality comp1nts and employ individuals with a significant degree of technical expertise. If our designs are defective, or the material comp1nts used in our products are subject to wearing out, or if suppliers fail to deliver comp1nts to specification, or if our employees fail to properly assemble, test and package our products, the reliability and performance of our products will be adversely impacted. If our products contain defects that cannot be repaired easily, inexpensively, or on a timely basis, we may experience Damage to our brand reputation; Loss of customer orders and delay in order fulfillment; Increased costs due to product repair or replacement; Inability to attract new customers; Diversion of resources from our manufacturing and research and development departments into our service department; and Legal action. The occurrence of any 1 or more of the foregoing could materially increase expenses, adversely impact profitability and harm our business. 26 Table of Contents Product liability suits could be brought against us due to a defective design, material or workmanship or misuse of our products and could result in expensive and time consuming litigation, payment of substantial damages and an increase in our insurance rates. If our products are defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, we may become subject to substantial and costly litigation by our customers or their patients. Misusing our products or failing to adhere to operating guidelines could cause significant eye and skin damage, and underlying tissue damage. In addition, if our operating guidelines are found to be inadequate, we may be subject to liability. We have been involved, and may in the future be involved, in litigation related to the use of our products. Product liability claims could divert management attention from our core business, be expensive to defend and result in sizable damage awards against us. We may not have sufficient insurance coverage for all future claims. We may not be able to obtain insurance in amounts or scope sufficient to provide us with adequate coverage against all potential liabilities. Any product liability claims brought against us, with or without merit, could increase our product liability insurance rates or prevent us from securing continuing coverage, could harm our reputation in the industry and could reduce product sales. In addition, we historically experienced steep increases in our product liability insurance premiums as a percentage of revenue. If our premiums continue to rise, we may no longer be able to afford adequate insurance coverage. If customers are not trained and or our products are used by non physicians, it could result in product misuse and adverse treatment outcomes, which could harm our reputation, result in product liability litigation, distract management and result in additional costs, all of which could harm our business. Because we do not require training for users of our products, and sell our products at times to non physicians, there exists an increased potential for misuse of our products, which could harm our reputation and our business. U.S. federal regulations allow us to sell our products to or on the order of licensed practiti1rs. The definition of licensed practiti1rs varies from state to state. As a result, our products may be purchased or operated by physicians with varying levels of training, and in many states, by non physicians, including nurse practiti1rs, chiropractors and technicians. Outside the U.S., many jurisdictions do not require specific qualifications or training for purchasers or operators of our products. We do not supervise the procedures performed with our products, nor do we require that direct medical supervision occur. We and our distributors generally offer but do not require product training to the purchasers or operators of our products. In addition, we sometimes sell our systems to companies that rent our systems to third parties and that provide a technician to perform the procedures. The lack of training and the purchase and use of our products by non physicians may result in product misuse and adverse treatment outcomes, which could harm our reputation and our business, and, in the event these result in product liability litigation, distract management and subject us to liability, including legal expenses. Adverse conditions in the global banking industry and credit markets may adversely impact the value of our marketable investments or impair our liquidity. We invest our excess cash primarily in m1y market funds and in highly liquid debt instruments of the U.S. government and its agencies and U.S. municipalities, in commercial paper and high grade corporate debt. As of December 31, 2016, our balance in marketable investments was $40 million. The longer the duration of a security, the more susceptible it is to changes in market interest rates and bond yields. As yields increase, those securities with a lower yield at cost show a mark to market unrealized loss. For example, assuming a hypothetical increase in interest rates of 1 percentage point, the fair value of our total investment portfolio as of December 31, 2016 would have potentially decreased by approximately $198 ,000, resulting in an unrealized loss that would subsequently adversely impact our earnings. As a result, changes in the market interest rates will affect our future net income (loss). Our manufacturing operations are dependent upon third party suppliers, making us vulnerable to supply shortages and price fluctuations, which could harm our business. Many of the comp1nts and materials that comprise our products are currently manufactured by a limited number of suppliers. A supply interruption or an increase in demand beyond our current suppliers capabilities could harm our ability to manufacture our products until a new source of supply is identified and qualified. Our reliance on these suppliers subjects us to a number of risks that could harm our business, including Interruption of supply resulting from modifications to or discontinuation of a supplier operations; Delays in product shipments resulting from uncorrected defects, reliability issues or a supplier variation in a comp1nt; A lack of long term supply arrangements for key comp1nts with our suppliers; Inability to obtain adequate supply in a timely manner, or on reasonable terms; Inability to redesign 1 or more comp1nts in our systems in the event that a supplier discontinues manufacturing such comp1nts and we are unable to source it from other suppliers on reasonable terms; Difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our comp1nts in a timely manner; Production delays related to the evaluation and testing of products from alternative suppliers and corresponding regulatory qualifications; and Delay in supplier deliveries. Any interruption in the supply of comp1nts or materials, or our inability to obtain substitute comp1nts or materials from alternate sources at acceptable prices in a timely manner, could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers, which would have an adverse effect on our business. 27 Table of Contents Intellectual property rights may not provide adequate protection for some or all of our products, which may permit third parties to compete against us more effectively. We rely on patent, copyright, trade secret and trademark laws and confidentiality agreements to protect our technology and products. At December 31, 2016, we had 34 issued U.S. patents . Some of our comp1nts, such as our laser module, electronic control system and high voltage electronics, are not, and in the future may not be, protected by patents. Additionally, our patent applications may not issue as patents or, if issued, may not issue in a form that will be advantageous to us. Any patents we obtain may be challenged, invalidated or legally circumvented by third parties. Consequently, competitors could market products and use manufacturing processes that are substantially similar to, or superior to, ours. We may not be able to prevent the unauthorized disclosure or use of our technical knowledge or other trade secrets by consultants, vendors, former employees or current employees, despite the existence generally of confidentiality agreements and other contractual restrictions. Monitoring unauthorized uses and disclosures of our intellectual property is difficult, and we do not know whether the steps we have taken to protect our intellectual property will be effective. Moreover, the laws of many foreign countries will not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the U.S. The absence of complete intellectual property protection exposes us to a greater risk of direct competition. Competitors could purchase 1 of our products and attempt to replicate some or all of the competitive advantages we derive from our development efforts, design around our protected technology, or develop their own competitive technologies that fall outside of our intellectual property rights. If our intellectual property is not adequately protected against competitors products and methods, our competitive position and our business could be adversely affected. We may be involved in future costly intellectual property litigation, which could impact our future business and financial performance. Our competitors or other patent holders may assert that our present or future products and the methods we employ are covered by their patents. In addition, we do not know whether our competitors own or will obtain patents that they may claim prevent, limit or interfere with our ability to make, use, sell or import our products. Although we may seek to resolve any potential future claims or actions, we may not be able to do so on reasonable terms, or at all. If, following a successful third party action for infringement, we cannot obtain a license or redesign our products, we may have to stop manufacturing and selling the applicable products and our business would suffer as a result. In addition, a court could require us to pay substantial damages, and prohibit us from using technologies essential to our products, any of which would have a material adverse effect on our business, results of operations and financial condition. We may become involved in litigation not only as a result of alleged infringement of a third party intellectual property rights but also to protect our own intellectual property. For example, we have been, and may hereafter become, involved in litigation to protect the trademark rights associated with our company name or the names of our products. Infringement and other intellectual property claims, with or without merit, can be expensive and time consuming to litigate, and could divert management attention from our core business. The expense and potential unavailability of insurance coverage for our customers could adversely affect our ability to sell our products, and therefore adversely affect our financial condition. Some of our customers and prospective customers have had difficulty procuring or maintaining liability insurance to cover their operation and use of our products. Medical malpractice carriers are withdrawing coverage in certain states or substantially increasing premiums. If this trend continues or worsens, our customers may discontinue using our products and potential customers may opt against purchasing laser based products due to the cost or inability to procure insurance coverage. The unavailability of insurance coverage for our customers and prospects could adversely affect our ability to sell our products, and that could harm our financial condition. From time to time we may become subject to income tax audits or similar proceedings, and as a result we may incur additional costs and expenses or owe additional taxes, interest and penalties that may negatively impact our operating results. We are subject to income taxes in the United States and certain foreign jurisdictions where we operate through a subsidiary , including Australia, Belgium, Canada, France, Hong Kong, Japan , Spain, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. Our determination of our tax liability is subject to review by applicable domestic and foreign tax authorities. We are currently under audit for our California sales and use tax returns for the period July 2013 through June 2016, and are uncertain of the potential outcome of this audit. Also, in June 2016, we underwent an audit of our Canadian goods and services tax and harmonized sales tax returns for the period January 2013 to July 2015. Although this audit resulted in immaterial adjustments, the final timing and resolution of any future tax examinations are subject to significant uncertainty and could result in our having to pay amounts to the applicable tax authority in order to resolve examination of our tax positions, which could result in an increase or decrease of our current estimate of unrecognized tax benefits and may negatively impact our financial position, results of operations or cash flows. 28 Table of Contents We may be adversely affected by changes in U.S. tax laws , importation taxes and other changes that may be imposed by the current administration . Congress and the current administration have indicated a desire to reform the U.S. corporate income tax. As part of any tax reform, it is possible that the current corporate income tax rate may be reduced, and there may be other potential changes including limiting or eliminating various other deductions, credits or tax preferences. In addition, if the current administration starts levying import taxes on products being sourced from Mexico and other international locations from where we source comp1nts for building our products, this could adversely affect our cost of producing our products and profitability. At this time, it is not possible to measure the potential impact on the value of our business, prospects or results of operations that might result upon enactment of U.S tax laws and other changes . Any acquisitions that we make could result in operating difficulties, dilution, and other consequences that may adversely impact our business and results of operations. While we from time to time evaluate potential acquisitions of businesses, products and technologies, and anticipate continuing to make these evaluations, we have no present understandings, commitments or agreements with respect to any material acquisitions or collaborative projects We may not be able to identify appropriate acquisition candidates or strategic partners, or successfully negotiate, finance or integrate any businesses, products or technologies that we acquire. We have limited experience as a team with acquiring companies and products. Furthermore, the integration of any acquisition and management of any collaborative project may divert management time and resources from our core business and disrupt our operations and we may incur significant legal, accounting and banking fees in connection with such a transaction. Acquisitions could diminish our available cash balances for other uses, result in the incurrence of debt, contingent liabilities, or amortization expenses, and restructuring charges. Also, the anticipated benefits or value of our acquisitions or investments may not materialize and could result in an impairment of goodwill and or purchased long lived assets, similar to the $650,000 charge we recorded in the fourth quarter of 2014 related to an acquisition completed in 2012 Our failure to address these risks or other problems encountered in connection with our past or future acquisitions and investments could cause us to fail to realize the anticipated benefits of such acquisitions or investments, incur unanticipated liabilities, and harm our business and our financial condition or results. Anti takeover provisions in our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, and Delaware law, contain provisions that could discourage a takeover. Our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, and Delaware law, contain provisions that might enable our management to resist a takeover, and might make it more difficult for an investor to acquire a substantial block of our common stock. These provisions include A classified board of directors; Advance notice requirements to stockholders for matters to be brought at stockholder meetings; Limitations on stockholder actions by written consent; and The right to issue preferred stock without stockholder approval, which could be used to dilute the stock ownership of a potential hostile acquirer. These provisions, as well as Change of Control and Severance Agreements entered into with each of our executive officers and certain key employees, might discourage, delay or prevent a change in control of our company or a change in our management. The existence of these provisions could adversely affect the voting power of holders of common stock and limit the price that investors might be willing to pay in the future for shares of our common stock. In addition, as a Delaware corporation, we are subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporation Law. These provisions may prohibit large stockholders, in particular those owning 15% or more of our outstanding voting stock, from merging or combining with us for a certain period of time. Any of these provisions could, under certain circumstances, depress the market price of our common stock. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS Not applicable. ITEM 2 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
